Brought to you by "Learnself with Yogendra" 
A Digital Library Of Yogendra Raj Sharma 

Contents  
PREFACE xvii  1 A Survey of Computer 2-2  
Graphics 2  
Computer-Aided Design 2-3  Presentation Graphics 'I 2-4  Computer Art l3 2-5  Entertainment 18  
Education and Training 2 1  Visualization 25  Image Processing 3 2  Graphical User Interfaces 3 4  
Overview of Graphics 2 systems 35 2-6  
2-1 VideoDisplayDevices 36 2-7  Refresh Cathode-Ray Tubes 37  Raster-Scan Displays 40  Random-Scan Displays 41  Color CRT Monitors 42  Direct-View Storage Tubes 4.5  Flat-Panel Displays 45  Three-Dimensional Viewing Devices 49  
Stereoscopic and Virtual-Reality  
Systems  
Raster-Scan System!;  
Video Controller  
Raster-Scan Display Processor  
Random-Scan Systems  
Graphics Monitors and Workstations  Input Devices  
Keyboards  
Mouse  
Trackball and Spaceball  
Joysticks  
Data Glove  
Digitizers  
Image Scanners  
Touch Panels  
Light Pens  
Voice Systems  
Hard-Copy Devices  
Graphics Software  
Coordinate Representations  
Graphics Functions  
Software Standards  
PHIGS Workstations  
Summary  
References  
Exercises  
vii  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Contents  
3 Outout Primitives 83  
Points and Lines  
Line-Drawing Algorithms  
DDA Algorithm  
Bresenham's Line Algorithm  
Parallel Line Algorithms  
Loading the Frame Buffer  
Line Function  
Circle-Generating Algorithms  
Properties of Circles  
Midpoint Circle Algorithm  
Ellipse-Generating Algorithms  
Properties of Ellipses  
Midpoint Ellipse Algorithm  
Other Curves  
Conic Sections  
Polynomials and Spline Curves  
Parallel Curve Algorithms  
Curve Functions  
Pixel Addressing  
and Object Geometry  
Screen Grid Coordinates  
Maintaining Geometric Properties  
of Displayed Objects  
Filled-Area Primitives  
Scan-Line Polygon Fill Algorithm  
Inside-Outside Tests  
Scan-Line Fill of Curved Boundary  
Areas  
Boundary-Fill Algorithm  
Flood-Fill Algorithm  
Fill-Area Functions  
Cell Array  
Character Generation  
Summary  
Applications  
References  
Exercises  
Attributes of Output  
Primitives 143  
Line Attributes  
Line Type  
Line Width  
Pen and Brush Options  
Line Color  
Curve Attributes  
Color and Grayscale Levels  
Color Tables  
Grayscale  
Area-Fill Attributes  
Fill Styles  
Pattern Fill  
Soft Fill  
Character Attributes  
Text Attributes  
Marker Attributes  
Bundled Attributes  
Bundled Line Attributes  
Bundled Area-Fi Attributes  
Bundled Text Attributes  
Bundled Marker Attributes  
Inquiry Functions  
Antialiasing  
Supersampling Straight Line  
Segments  
Pixel-Weighting Masks  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
Contents  
Area Sampling Straight Line 5-6 Aff ine Transformations 208  Segments 174 5-7 Transformation Functions 208  Filtering Techniques 174 5-8 Raster Methods for Transformations 210  Pixel Phasing 1 75 Summary 212  Compensating for Line lntensity  
Differences 1 75 References 21 3  Antialiasing Area Boundaries 1 76 Exercises 213  

Summary  References  Exercises  
180 6 Viewing 21 6  Two-Dimensional  
6-1 The Viewing Pipeline  

5 Two-Dimensional Geometric 6-2 Viewing Coordinate Reference Frame  183 6-3 Window-teviewport Coordinate Transformations Transformation  

5-1 Basic Transformations  
Translation  
Rotation  
Scaling  
5-2 Matrix Representations  
and Homogeneous Coordinates  
5-3 Composite Transformations  Translations  
Rotations  
Scalings  
General Pivot-Point Rotation  
General Fixed-Point Scaling  
General Scaling Directions  
Concatenation Properties  
General Composite Transformations  and Computational Efficiency  
5-4 Other Transformations  
Reflection  
Shear  
Two-Dimensional Wewing Functions  Clipping Operations  
Point Clipping  
Line Clipping  
Cohen-Sutherland Line Clipping  Liang-Barsky Line Clipping  Nicholl-Lee-Nicholl Line Clipping  Line Clipping Using Nonrectangular  Clip Windows  
Splitting Concave Polygons  
Polygon Clipping  
Sutherland-Hodgernan Polygon  Clipping  
Weiler-Atherton Polygon Clipping  Other Polygon-Clipping Algorithms  Curve Clipping  
Text Clipping  
Exterior Clipping  
Summary  

5-5 Transformations Between Coordinate References  
Systems 205 Exercises  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
7 Structures and Hierarchical  Modeling 250  
7-1 Structure Concepts 250  Basic Structure Functions 250  Setting Structure Attributes 253  
7-2 Editing Structures 254  Structure Lists and the Element  
Pointer 255  
Setting the Edit Mode 250  Inserting Structure Elements 256  
Replacing Structure Elements 257  
Deleting Structure Elements 257  
Labeling Structure Elements 258  
Copying Elements from One Structure  
to Another 260  7-3 Basic Modeling Concepts 2 60  Mode1 Representations 261  
Symbol Hierarchies 262  
Modeling Packages. 263  7-4 Hierarchical Modeling  
with Structures 265  Local Coordinates and Modeling  
Transformations 265  Modeling Transformations 266  Structure Hierarchies 266  Summary 268  References 269  
Exercises 2 69  
Graphical User Interfaces  
8 and Interactive lnput  
Methods 271  
8-1 The User Dialogue  
Windows and Icons  
Accommodating Multiple  
Skill Levels  
Consistency  
Minimizing Memorization  
Backup and Error Handling  
Feed back  
8-2 lnput of Graphical Data  
Logical Classification of Input  
Devices  
Locator Devices  
Stroke Devices  
String Devices  
Valuator Devices  
Choice Devices  
Pick Devices  
8-3 lnput Functions  
Input Modes  
Request Mode  
Locator and Stroke Input  
in Request Mode  
String Input in Request Mode  
Valuator Input in Request Mode  
Choice lnput in Request Mode  
Pick Input in Request Mode  
Sample Mode  
Event Mode  
Concurrent Use of Input Modes  
8-4 Initial Values for Input-Device  
Parameters  
8-5 lnteractive Picture-Construction  
Techniques  
Basic Positioning Methods  
Constraints  
Grids  
Gravity Field  
Rubber-Band Methods  
Dragging  
Painting and Drawing  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
8-6 Virtual-Reality Environments 292 10-4  Summary 233  
References 294  
Exercises 294 10-5  10-6  
9 Three-Dimensional  
Concepts 296  
9-1 Three-Dimensional Display Methods  
Parallel Projection  
Perspective Projection  
Depth Cueing  
Visible Line and Surface  
Identification  
Surface Rendering  
Exploded and Cutaway Views  
Three-Dimensional and Stereoscopic  
Views  
9-2 Three-Dimensional Graphics  
Packages 302  
Three-Dimensional  
10-1 Polygon Surfaces  
Polygon Tables  
Plane Equations  
Polygon Meshes  
10-2 Curved Lines and Surfaces  
10-3 Quadric Sutiaces  
Sphere  
Ellipsoid  
Torus  
Superquadrics  
Superellipse  
Superellipsoid  
Blobby Objects  
Spline Representations  
Interpolation and Approximation  Splines  
Parametric Continuity  
Conditions  
Geometric Continuity  
Conditions  
Spline Specifications  
Cubic Spline Interpolation  
Methods  
Natural Cubic Splines  
Hermite Interpolation  
Cardinal Splines  
Kochanek-Bartels Splines  
Bezier Curves and Surfaces  
Bezier Curves  
Properties of Bezier Curves  
Design Techniques Using Bezier  
Curves  
Cubic Ezier Curves  
Bezier Surfaces  
B-Spline Curves and Surfaces  
B-Spline Curves  
Uniform, Periodic B-Splines  
Cubic, Periodic €3-Splines  
Open, Uniform B-Splines  
Nonuniform 13-Splines  
B-Spline Surfaces  
Beta-Splines  
Beta-Spline Continuity  
Conditions  
Cubic, Periodic Beta-Spline  
Matrix Representation  
Rational Splines  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Contents  
Conversion Between Spline  
Representations  
Displaying Spline Curves  
and Surfaces  
Homer's Rule  
Forward-Difference Calculations  
Subdivision Methods  
Sweep Representations  
Constructive Solid-Geometry  
Methods  
Octrees  
BSP Trees  
Fractal-Geometry Methods  
Fractal-Generation Procedures  
Classification of Fractals  
Fractal Dimension  
Geometric Construction  
of Deterministic Self-Similar  
Fractals  
Geometric Construction  
of Statistically Self-Similar  
Fractals  
Affine Fractal-Construction  
Methods  
Random Midpoint-Displacement  
Methods  
Controlling Terrain Topography  
Self-squaring Fractals  
Self-inverse Fractals  
Shape Grammars and Other  
Procedural Methods  
Particle Systems  
Physically Based Modeling  
Visualization of Data Sets  
Visual Representations  
for Scalar Fields  
VisuaI Representations  
for Vector Fields  
Visual Representations  
for Tensor Fields  
Visual Representations  
for Multivariate Data Fields 402  Summary 404  References 404  Exercises 404  
Three-Dimensional  
11 Geometric and Modeling  Transformations 407  
Translation 408  Rotation 409  Coordinate-Axes Rotations 409  General Three-Dimensional  
Rotations 41 3  Rotations with Quaternions 419  Scaling 420  Other Transformat~ons 422  Reflections 422  Shears 423  Conlposite Transformations 423  Three-Dimens~onal Transformation  
Functions 425  Modeling and Coordinate  
Transformations 426  Summary 429  References 429  Exercises 430  
Three-Dimensional 12 Viewing 43 1  
12-1 Viewing Pipeline 432  12-2 Viewing Coordinates 433  Specifying the Virbw Plane 433  Transformation from World  

- 40 1 to Viewing Coordinates 437  
xii  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
Projections  
Parallel Projections  
Perspective IJrojections  
View Volumes and General  
Projection Transformations  
General Parallel-Projection  
Transformations  
General Perspective-Projection  
Transformations  
Clipping  
Normalized View Volumes  
Viewport Clipping  
Clipping in Homogeneous  
Coordinates  
Hardware Implementations  
Three-Dimensional Viewing  
Functions  
Summary  
References  
Exercises  
Visi ble-Su dace Detection  
Met hods 469  
Classification of Visible-Surface  
D~tection Algorithms  
Back-Face Detection  
Depth-Buffer Method  
A-Buffer Method  
Scan-Line Method  
Depth-Sorting Method  
BSP-Tree Method  
Area-Subdivision Method  
Octree Methods  
Ray-Casting Met hod  
Curved Surfaces  
Curved-Surface Representations  
Surface Contour Plots  
Contents  
1 3-1 2 Wireframe Methods 490  13-1 3 Visibility-Detection Functions 490  Summary 49 1  
Keferences 492  
Exercises 49 2  
lllumination Models  
14 and Surface-Rendering  Methods 494  
Light Sources  
Basic lllumination Models  
Ambient Light  
Diffuse Reflection  
Specular Reflection  
and the Phong Model  
Combined Diffuse and Specular  
Reflections with Multiple Light  
Sources  
Warn Model  
Intensity Attenuation  
Color Considerations  
Transparency  
Shadows  
Displaying Light Intensities  
Assigning Intensity Levels  
Gamma Correction and Video  
Lookup Tables  
Displaying Continuous-Tone  
Images  
Halftone Patterns and Dithering  
Techniques  
Halftone Approximations  
Dithering Techniques  
Polygon-Rendering Methods  
Constant-Intensity Shading  
Gouraud Shading  
Phong Shading  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Contents  
Fast Phong Shading  
Ray-Tracing Methods  
Basic Ray-Tracing Algorithm  
Ray-Surface Intersection  
CaIculations  
Reducing Object-Intersection  
Calculations  
Space-Subdivision Methods  
AntiaIiased Ray Tracing  
Distributed Ray Tracing  
Radiosity Lighting Model  
Basic Radiosity Model  
Progressive Refinement  
Radiosity Method  
Environment Mapping  
Adding Surface Detail  
Modeling Surface Detail  
with Polygons  
Texture Mapping  
Procedural Texturing  
Methods  
Bump Mapping  
Frame Mapping  
Summary  
References  
Exercises  
15-6 CMY Color Model  
15-7 HSV Color Model  
15-8 Conversion Between HSV  
and RGB Models  
15-9 HLS Color Model  
1 5-1 0 Color Selection  
and Applications  
Summary  
Reierences  
Exercises  
16 Computer  
Animation 583  
14-1 Design of Animation Sequences  16-2 General Computer-Animation  Functions  
16-3 Raster Animations  
16-4 Computer-Animation Languages  16-5 Key-Frame Systems  
Morphing  
Simulating Accelerations  
16-6 Motion Specifications  
Direct Motion Specification  
Goal-Directed Systems  
Kinematics and Dynamics  

Color Models and Color Summary  
Apd ications 564 References . , Exercises 597  Chromaticity Diagram 568 A Mathematics for Computer  
15-1 Properties of Light 565  
15-2 Standard Primaries and the  
XYZ Color Model 569 Graphics 599  CIE Chromaticity Diagram 569 A-1 Coordinate-Reference Frames 600  1 5-3 Intuitive Color Concepts 571 Two-Dimensional Cartesian  

15-4 RGB Color Model  15-5 YIQ Color Model  
xiv  
572 Reference Frames 600  5 74 Polar Coordinates in the xy Plane 601  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Three-Dimensional Cartesian  
Reference Frames  
Three-Dimensional Curvilinear  
Coordinate Systems  
Solid Angle  
A-2 Points and Vectors  
Vector Addition and Scalar  
Multiplication  
Scalar Product of Two Vectors  
Vector Product of Two Vectors  
A-3 Basis Vectors and the Metric Tensor  Orthonormal Basis  
Metric Tensor  
A-4 Matrices  
Contents  
Matrix Transpose  
Determinant of a Matrix  Matrix Inverse  
Complex Numbers  
Quaternions  
Nonparametric Representations  Parametric Representations  Numerical Methods  
Solving Sets of Linear Equations  Finding Roots of Nonlinear  Equations  
Evaluating Integrals  
Fitting CUN~S to Data Sets  

Scalar Multiplication and Matrix BIBLIOGRAPHY  
Addition 612  
Matrix Multiplication 612 INDEX  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Graphics  
C Version  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 


www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
C omputers have become a powerful tool for the rapid and economical pro duction of pictures. There is virtually no area in which graphical displays  
cannot be used to some advantage, and so it is not surprising to find the use of  
computer graphics so widespread. Although early applications in engineering  
and science had to rely on expensive and cumbersome equipment, advances in  
computer technology have made interactive computer graphics a practical tool.  
Today, we find computer graphics used routinely in such diverse areas as science,  
engineering, medicine, business, industry, government, art, entertainment, ad 
vertising, education, and training. Figure 1-1 summarizes the many applications  
of graphics in simulations, education, and graph presentations. Before we get  
into the details of how to do computer graphics, we first take a short tour  
through a gallery of graphics applications.  
-  
F'I~~II~ 1 - I  
Examples of computer graphics applications. (Courtesy of DICOMED  
Corpora! ion.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
A major use of computer graphics is in design processes, particularly for engi 
neering and architectural systems, but almost all products are now computer de 
signed. Generally referred to as CAD, computer-aided design methods are now  
routinely used in the design of buildings, automobiles, aircraft, watercraft, space 
craft, computers, textiles, and many, many other products.  
For some design applications; objeck are f&t displayed in a wireframe out 
line form that shows the overall sham and internal features of obiects. Wireframe  
displays also allow designers to qui'ckly see the effects of interacthe adjustments  
to design shapes. Figures 1-2 and 1-3 give examples of wireframe displays in de 
sign applications.  
Software packages for CAD applications typically provide the designer  
with a multi-window environment, as in Figs. 1-4 and 1-5. The various displayed  
windows can show enlarged sections or different views of objects.  
Circuits such as the one shown in Fig. 1-5 and networks for comrnunica 
tions, water supply, or other utilities aR constructed with repeated placement of  
a few graphical shapes. The shapes used in a design represent the different net 
work or circuit components. Standard shapes for electrical, electronic, and logic  
circuits are often supplied by the design package. For other applications, a de 
signer can create personalized symbols that are to be used to constmct the net 
work or circuit. The system is then designed by successively placing components  
into the layout, with the graphics package automatically providing the connec 
tions between components. This allows the designer t~ quickly try out alternate  
circuit schematics for minimizing the number of components or the space re- - quired for the system.  

Figure 1-2  
Color-coded wireframe display for  
an automobile wheel assembly.  
(Courtesy of Emns b Sutherland.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 

Figure 1-3  
Color-coded wireframe displays of body designs for an aircraft and an automobile.  
(Courtesy of (a) Ewns 6 Suthcrhnd and (b) Megatek Corporation.)  
Animations are often used in CAD applications. Real-time animations using  
wiseframe displays on a video monitor are useful for testing perfonuance of a ve 
hicle or system, as demonstrated in Fig. ld. When we do not display objs with  
rendered surfaces, the calculations for each segment of the animation can be per 
formed quickly to produce a smooth real-time motion on the screen. Also, wire 
frame displays allow the designer to see into the interior of the vehicle and to  
watch the behavior of inner components during motion. Animations in virtual 
reality environments are used to determine how vehicle operators are affected by  

Figure 1-4  
Multiple-window, color-coded CAD workstation displays. (Courtesy of Intergraph  
Corporation.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 

Figure 1-5  
A drcuitdesign application, using  
multiple windows and colorcded  
logic components, displayed on a Sun workstation with attached  
speaker and microphone. (Courtesy  
of Sun Microsystems.)  
-. -  
Figure 1-6  
Simulation of vehicle performance  
during lane changes. (Courtesy of  
Ewns 6 Sutherland and Mechanical  
Dynrrrnics, lnc.)  
certain motions. As the tractor operator in Fig. 1-7 manipulates the controls, the  
headset presents a stereoscopic view (Fig. 1-8) of the front-loader bucket or the  
backhoe, just as if the operator were in the tractor seat. This allows the designer  
to explore various positions of the bucket or backhoe that might obstruct the op  
erator's view, which can then be taken into account in the overall hactor design.  
Figure 1-9 shows a composite, wide-angle view from the tractor seat, displayed  
on a standard video monitor instead of in a virtual threedimensional scene. And  
Fig. 1-10 shows a view of the tractor that can be displayed in a separate window  
or on another monitor.  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 

- - - -- -  
Figure 1-7  
Operating a tractor In a virtual-dty envimnment. As the contFols are  
moved, the operator views the front loader, backhoe, and surroundings  
through the headset. (Courtesy of the National Center for Supercomputing  
Applicath, Univmity of Illinois at Urba~Chrrmpign, and Catopillnr,  
Inc.)  


Figure 1-8  
A headset view of the backhoe  presented to the tractor operator.  (Courtesy of the Notional Centerfor  Supcomputing Applications,  UniwrsifV of Illinois at Urbam-  ~hrrmpi&nd Caterpillnr, Inc.)  
Figure 1-9  
Operator's view of the tractor  
bucket, cornposited in several  
sections to form a wide-angle view  
on a standard monitor. (Courtesy oi  
the National Centerfor  
Supercomputing Applications,  
University of lllinois at Urhno 
Chmpign, and Caterpillnr, Inc.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
Chapter 1  
A Survey of Computer Graphics  
Figure 1-10  
View of the tractor displayed on a  
standad monitor. (Courtesy of tk  
National Cmter for Superwmputing  
ApplicPths, Uniwrsity of Illinois at  
UrbP~Uwmpign, and Gterpilhr,  
Inc.)  
When obpd designs are complete, or nearly complete, realistic lighting  
models and surface rendering are applied to produce displays that wiU show the  
appearance of the final product. Examples of this are given in Fig. 1-11. Realistic  
displays are also generated for advertising of automobiles and other vehicles  
using special lighting effects and background scenes (Fig. 1-12).  
The manufaduring process is also tied in to the computer description of de  
signed objects to automate the construction of the product. A circuit board lay 
out, for example, can be transformed into a description of the individud  
processes needed to construct the layout. Some mechanical parts are manufac 
tured by describing how the surfaces are to be formed with machine tools. Figure  
1-13 shows the path to be taken by machine tools over the surfaces of an object  
during its construction. Numerically controlled machine tools are then set up to  
manufacture the part according to these construction layouts.  

~ealistic renderings of design products. (Courtesy of fa) Intergraph  
Corpomtion and fb) Emns b Sutherland.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 


Figure 1-12  
Studio lighting effects and realistic  surfacerendering techniques are  applied to produce advertising  pieces for finished products. The  data for this rendering of a Chrysler  Laser was supplied by Chrysler  Corporation. (Courtesy of Eric  Haines, 3DIEYE Inc. )  
Figure 1-14  
Figure 1-13  
A CAD layout for describing the  numerically controlled machining  of a part. The part surface is  displayed in one mlor and the tool  path in another color. (Courtesy of  Los Alamm National Labomtoty.)  

Architectural CAD layout for a building design. (Courtesy of Precision  
Visuals, Inc., Boulder, Colorado.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
Chapter 1  
A Survey of Computer Graphics  
Architects use interactive graphics methods to lay out floor plans, such as  Fig. 1-14, that show the positioning of rooms, doon, windows, stairs, shelves,  counters, and other building features. Working from the display of a building  layout on a video monitor, an electrical designer can try out arrangements for  wiring, electrical outlets, and fire warning systems. Also, facility-layout packages  can be applied to the layout to determine space utilization in an office or on a  manufacturing floor.  
Realistic displays of architectural designs, as in Fig. 1-15, permit both archi tects and their clients to study the appearance of a single building or a group of  buildings, such as a campus or industrial complex. With virtual-reality systems,  designers can even go for a simulated "walk" through the rooms or around the  outsides of buildings to better appreciate the overall effect of a particular design.  In addition to realistic exterior building displays, architectural CAD packages  also provide facilities for experimenting with three-dimensional interior layouts  and lighting (Fig. 1-16).  
Many other kinds of systems and products are designed using either gen eral CAD packages or specially dweloped CAD software. Figure 1-17, for exam ple, shows a rug pattern designed with a CAD system.  

-  
Figrrre 1-15  
Realistic, three-dimensional rmderings of building designs. (a) A street-level perspective  for the World Trade Center project. (Courtesy of Skidmore, Owings & Mmill.)  
(b) Architectural visualization of an atrium, created for a compdter animation by  Marialine Prieur, Lyon, France. (Courtesy of Thomson Digital Imngc, Inc.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 


Figure 1-17  
Oriental rug pattern created with  
computer graphics design methods.  
(Courtesy of Lexidnta Corporation.)  
. -  
Figtin 1-16  
A hotel corridor providing a sense  of movement by placing light  fixtures along an undulating path  and creating a sense of enhy by  using light towers at each hotel  room. (Courtesy of Skidmore, Owings  B Menill.)  

PRESENTATION GRAPHICS  
Another major applicatidn ama is presentation graphics, used to produce illus 
trations for reports or to generate 35-mm slides or transparencies for use with  
projectors. Presentation graphics is commonly used to summarize financial, sta 
tistical, mathematical, scientific, and economic data for research reports, manage  
rial reports, consumer information bulletins, and other types of reports. Worksta 
tion devices and service bureaus exist for converting screen displays into 35-mm  
slides or overhead transparencies for use in presentations. Typical examples of  
presentation graphics are bar charts, line graphs, surface graphs, pie charts, and  
other displays showing relationships between multiple parametem.  
Figure 1-18 gives examples of two-dimensional graphics combined with ge  
ographical information. This illustration shows three colorcoded bar charts com 
bined onto one graph and a pie chart with three sections. Similar graphs and  
charts can be displayed in three dimensions to provide additional information.  
Three-dimensional graphs are sometime used simply for effect; they can provide  
a more dramatic or more attractive presentation of data relationships. The charts  
in Fig. 1-19 include a three-dimensional bar graph and an exploded pie chart.  
Additional examples of three-dimensional graphs are shown in Figs. 1-20  
and 1-21. Figure 1-20 shows one kind of surface plot, and Fig. 1-21 shows a two 
dimensional contour plot with a height surface.  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Chapter 1  
A SUN^^ of Computer Graph~s  


Figure 1-18  
Two-dimensional bar chart and me  chart hked to a geographical clh.  (Court~sy of Computer Assocbtes,  copyrighi 0 1992: All rights reserved.)  
Figure 1-19  
Three-dimensional bar chart.  exploded pie chart, and line graph.  (Courtesy of Cmnputer Associates,  copyi'ghi 6 1992: All rights reserved.)  



Figure 1-20  
Showing relationships with a  surface chart. (Courtesy of Computer  Associates, copyright O 1992. All  rights reserved.)  
Figure 1-21  
Plotting two-dimensional contours  in the &und plane, with a height  field plotted as a surface above the  
pund plane. (Cmrtesy of Computer  Associates, copyright 0 1992. All  rights d.j  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 

Figure 1-22  
Tie chart displaying relevant  
information about ppct tasks.  
(Courtesy of computer Associntes,  
copyright 0 1992. ,411 rights md.)  
Figure 1-22 illustrates a time chart used in task planning. Tine charts and  task network layouts are used in project management to schedule and monitor  the progess of propcts.  
1-3  
COMPUTER ART  
Computer graphics methods are widely used in both fine art and commercial art  applications. Artists use a variety of computer methods, including special-pur p&e hardware, artist's paintbrush (such as Lumens), other paint pack ages (such as Pixelpaint and Superpaint), specially developed software, symbolic  mathematits packages (such as Mathematics), CAD paclpges, desktop publish ing software, and animation packages that provide faciliHes for desigrung object  shapes and specifiying object motions.  
Figure 1-23 illustrates the basic idea behind a paintbrush program that al lows artists to "paint" pictures on the screen of a video monitor. Actually, the pic ture is usually painted electronically on a graphics tablet (digitizer) using a sty lus, which can simulate different brush strokes, brush widths, and colors. A  
paintbrush program was used to mte the characters in Fig. 1-24, who seem to  be busy on a creation of their own.  
A paintbrush system, with a Wacom cordlek, pressure-sensitive stylus, was  used to produce the electronic painting in Fig. 1-25 that simulates the brush  strokes of Van Gogh. The stylus transIates changing hand presswe into variable  line widths, brush sizes, and color gradations. Figure 1-26 shows a watercolor  painting produced with this stylus and with software that allows the artist to cre ate watercolor, pastel, or oil brush effects that simulate different drying out times,  wetness, and footprint. Figure 1-27 gives an example of paintbrush methods  combined with scanned images.  
Fine artists use a variety of other computer technologies to produce images.  To create pictures such as the one shown in Fig. 1-28, the artist uses a combina tion of three-dimensional modeling packages, texture mapping, drawing pro grams, and CAD software. In Fig. 1-29, we have a painting produced on a pen  
kclion 1-3  
Computer Art  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 


Figure 1-23  
Cartoon drawing produced with a paintbrush program,  
symbolically illustrating an artist at work on a video monitor.  
(Courtesy of Gould Inc., Imaging 6 Graphics Division and Aurora  
Imaging.)  
plotter with specially designed software that can mate "automatic art" without  
intervention from the artist.  
Figure 1-30 shows an example of "mathematical" art. This artist uses a corn 
biation of mathematical fundions, fractal procedures, Mathematics software,  
ink-jet printers, and other systems to create a variety of three-dimensional and  
two-dimensional shapes and stereoscopic image pairs. Another example of elm 

Figure 1-24  
Cartoon demonstrations of an "artist" mating a picture with a paintbrush system. The picture, drawn on a  graphics tablet, is displayed on the video monitor as the elves look on. In (b), the cartoon is superimposed  on the famous Thomas Nast drawing of Saint Nicholas, which was input to the system with a video  camera, then scaled and positioned. (Courtesy Gould Inc., Imaging & Gmphics Division and Aurora Imaging.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 


Figure 1-25  
A Van Gogh look-alike created by  graphcs artist E&abeth O'Rourke  with a cordless, pressuresensitive  stylus. (Courtesy of Wacom  Technology Corpomtion.)  
Figure 1-26  
An elechPnic watercolor, painted  by John Derry of Tune Arts, Inc.  using a cordless, pressure-sensitive  stylus and Lwnena gouache-brush  &ware. (Courtesy of Wacom  Technology Corporation.)  


Figure 1-27  
The artist of this picture, called Electrunic Awlnnche, makes a statement  
about our entanglement with technology using a personal computer  
with a graphics tablet and Lumena software to combine renderings of  
leaves, Bower petals, and electronics componenb with scanned images.  
(Courtesy of the Williams Gallery. wght 0 1991 by Imn Tnrckenbrod, Tke  
School of the Arf Instituie of Chicago.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 

Figwe 1-28 Figure 1-29  
From a series called Sphnrs of Inpumce, this electronic painting Electronic art output to a pen  (entitled, WhigmLaree) was awted with a combination of plotter from software specially  methods using a graphics tablet, three-dimensional modeling, designed by the artist to emulate  texture mapping, and a series of transformations. (Courtesy of the his style. The pen plotter includes  Williams Gallery. Copyn'sht (b 1992 by wne RPgland,]r.) multiple pens and painting  inshuments, including Chinese  
brushes. (Courtesy of the Williams  
Gallery. Copyright 8 by Roman  
Vmtko, Minneapolis College of Art 6  
Design.)  


Figure 1-30  
This creation is based on a visualization of Fermat's Last  Theorem, I" + y" = z", with n = 5, by Andrew Hanson,  Department of Computer Science, Indiana University. The image  was rendered using Mathematics and Wavefront software.  (Courtesy of the Williams Gallery. Copyright 8 1991 by Stcmrt  Dirkson.)  
Figure 1-31  
Using mathematical hlnctiow,  
fractal procedures, and  
supermmpu ters, this artist 
composer experiments with various  
designs to synthesii form and color  
with musical composition. (Courtesy  
of Brian Ewns, Vanderbilt University.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
tronic art created with the aid of mathematical relationships is shown in Fig. 1-31. seaion 1-3  The artwork of this composer is often designed in relation to frequency varia- Computer Art  tions and other parameters in a musical composition to produce a video that inte 
grates visual and aural patterns.  
Although we have spent some time discussing current techniques for gen 
erating electronic images in the fine arts, these methods are also applied in com 
mercial art for logos and other designs, page layouts combining text and graph 
ics, TV advertising spots, and other areas. A workstation for producing page  
layouts that combine text and graphics is ihstrated in Fig. 1-32.  
For many applications of commercial art (and in motion pictures and other  
applications), photorealistic techniques are used to render images of a product.  
Figure 1-33 shows an example of logo design, and Fig. 1-34 gives three computer  
graphics images for product advertising. Animations are also usxi frequently in  
advertising, and television commercials are produced frame by frame, where  


liprt. 1-32  
Page-layout workstation. (Courtesy  oj Visunl Technology.)  
Figure 1-33  
Three-dimens~onal rendering for a  logo. (Courtesy of Vertigo Technology,  Inc.)  



Fi<yuru 1 - 34  
- .  

Product advertising. (Courtesy oj la) Audrey Fleisherand lb) and lc) SOFTIMAGE, Inc.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Chapter 1 each frame of the motion is rendered and saved as an image file. In each succes 
A Survey of Computer Graphics sive frame, the motion is simulated by moving ow positions slightly from their  positions in the previous frame. When all frames in the animation sequence have  
been mdered, the frames are transfed to film or stored in a video buffer for  
playback. Film animations require 24 frames for each second in the animation se 
quence. If the animation is to be played back on a video monitor, 30 frames per  
second are required.  
A common graphics method employed in many commercials is rnorphing,  
where one obiect is transformed (metamomhosed) into another. This method has  
been used in h commercials to an oii can into an automobile engine, an au 
tomobile into a tiger, a puddle of water into a tk, and one person's face into an 
other face. An example of rnorphing is given in Fig. 1-40.  
1-4  
ENTERTAINMENT  
Computer graphics methods am now commonly used in making motion pic 
tures, music videos, and television shows. Sometimes the graphics scenes are dis 
played by themselves, and sometimes graphics objects are combined with the ac 
tors and live scenes.  
A graphics scene generated for the movie Star Trek-% Wrath of Khan is  
shown in Fig. 1-35. The planet and spaceship are drawn in wirefame form and  
will be shaded with rendering methods to produce solid surfaces. Figure 1-36  
shows scenes generated with advanced modeling and surfacerendering meth ods for two awardwinning short h.  
Many TV series regularly employ computer graphics methods. Figure 1-37  
shows a scene pduced for the seriff Deep Space Nine. And Fig. 1-38 shows a  
wireframe person combined with actors in a live scene for the series Stay lhned.  

~ia~hia developed for the  
Paramount Pictures movie Stnr  
Trek-The Wllrrh of Khan. (Courtesy of  
Ewns & Sutherland.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
In Fig. 1-39, we have a highly realistic image taken from a reconstruction of thir- Mion 1-4  
teenth-century Dadu (now Beijing) for a Japanese broadcast. Enterlainrnent  
Music videos use graphin in several ways. Graphics objects can be com 
bined with the live action, as in Fig.1-38, or graphics and image processing tech 
niques can be used to produce a transformation of one person or object into an 
other (morphing). An example of morphing is shown in the sequence of scenes in  
Fig. 1-40, produced for the David Byme video She's Mad.  

Fiprc 1-36  
(a) A computer-generated scene from the film Ms Dmm, copyright O Pixar 1987. (b) A  
computer-generated scene from the film KnicM, copyright O Pixar 1989. (Courfesy of  
Pixar.)  

- - - . - --. - - -  
I iprc 1- 17  
A graphics scene in the TV series Dwp Space Nine. (Courtesy of Rhythm b.  
Hues Studios.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
A Survey of Computer Graphics  

Figurp 1-38  
Graphics combined with a Live scene in the TV series Stay 7bned.  
(Courtesy of Rhythm 6 Hues Studios.)  

Figure 1-39  
An image from a &owhuction of  
thirteenth-centwy Dadu (Beijmg  
today), created by Taisei  
Corporation (Tokyo) and rendered  
with TDI software. (Courtesy of  
Thompson Digital Image, lnc.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
St*ion 1-5  
Education and Training  


Fipw I -413  
Examples of morphing from  
the David Byrne video Slw's  
Mnd. (Courtcsv of Dnvid Bvrne,  
I& video. oh ~acific Dota  
Images.)  

1-5  
EDUCATION AND TRAINING  
Computer-generated models of physical, financial, and economic systems are  
often used as educational aids. Models of physical systems, physiological sys 
tems, population trends, or equipment, such as the colorcoded diagram in Fig. 1-  
41, can help trainees to understand the operation of the system.  
For some training applications, special systems are designed. Examples of  
such specialized systems are the simulators for practice sessions or training of  
ship captains, aircraft pilots, heavy-equipment operators, and air trafficcontrol  
personnel. Some simulators have no video screens; for example, a flight simula 
tor with only a control panel for instrument flying. But most simulators provide  
graphics screens for visual operation. Two examples of large simulators with in 
ternal viewing systems are shown in Figs. 1-42 and 1-43. Another type of viewing  
system is shown in Fig. 144. Here a viewing screen with multiple panels is  
mounted in front of the simulator. and color projectors display the flight me on  
the screen panels. Similar viewing systems are used in simulators for training air 
craft control-tower personnel. Figure 1-45 gives an example of the inshuctor's  
area in a flight simulator. The keyboard is used to input parameters affeding the  
airplane performance or the environment, and the pen plotter is used to chart the  
path of the aircraft during a training session.  
Scenes generated for various simulators are shown in Figs. 1-46 through 1-  
48. An output from an automobile-driving simulator is given in Fig. 1-49. This  
simulator is used to investigate the behavior of drivers in critical situations. The  
drivers' reactions are then used as a basis for optimizing vehicle design to maxi 
mize traffic safety.  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 


Figure 1 -4 1  
Color-coded diagram used to  explain the operation of a nuclear  reactor. (Courtesy of Las Almnos  National laboratory.)  
- --  
Figure 143  
Figure 1-42  
A Me, enclosed tlight simulator  with a full-color visual system and  six degrees of freedom in its  motion. (Courtesy of Fmxm  Intematwml.)  


A military tank simulator with a visual imagery system. (Courtesy of  
Mediatech and GE Aerospace.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
kction 1-5  
Edwtion and Training  

Figure 1-44  
A fight simulator with an external full-zulor viewing system. (Courtay afFm  
InternafiomI.)  

Figure 1-45  
An instructor's area in a flight sunulator. The equipment allows the  
instructor to monitor flight conditions and to set airphne and  
environment parameters. (Courtesy of Frasur Infermtionol.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 

Fip 1-46  
Flightsimulator imagery. ((Courtesy 4 Emns 6 Sutherfund.)  

-  
Figure 1-47  
Figlire 1-48  
Imagery generated for a naval  
Space shuttle imagery. (Courtesy of  
simulator. (Courtesy of Ewns 6  
Mediatech and GE Aerospce.)  
Sutherlrmd.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 

Figure 1-49  
Imagery from an automobile  
simulator used to test driver  
reaction. (Courtesy of Evans 6  
Sutherlrmd.)  
1-6  
VISUALIZATION  
Scientists, engineers, medical personnel, business analysts, and others often need  to analyze large amounts of information or to study the behavior of certain  processes. Numerical simulations carried out on supercomputers frequently pro duce data files containing thousands and even millions of data values. Similarly,  satellite cameras and other sources are amassing large data files faster than they  can be interpreted. Scanning these large sets of numba to determine trends and  relationships is a tedious and ineffective process. But if the data are converted to  a visual form, the trends and patterns are often immediately apparent. Figure 1-  50 shows an example of a large data set that has been converted to a color-coded  display of relative heights above a ground plane. Once we have plotted the den sity values in this way, we can see easily the overall pattern of the data. Produc ing graphical representations for scientific, engineering, and medical data sets  and processes is generally referred to as scientific visualization. And the tenn busi ness visualization is used in connection with data sets related to commerce, indus try, and other nonscientific areas.  
There are many different kinds of data sets, and effective visualization  schemes depend on the characteristics of the data. A collection of data can con tain scalar values, vectors, higher-order tensors, or any combiytion of these data  types. And data sets can be two-dimensional or threedimensional. Color coding  is just one way to visualize a data set. Additional techniques include contour  plots, graphs and charts, surface renderings, and visualizations of volume interi ors. In addition, image processing techniques are combined with computer  graphics to produce many of the data visualizations.  
Mathematicians, physical scientists, and others use visual techniques to an alyze mathematical functions and processes or simply to produce interesting  graphical representations. A color plot of mathematical curve functions is shown  in Fig. 1-51, and a surface plot of a function is shown in Fig. 1-52. Fractal proce 
Wion 16  
Visualization  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
Chapter 1  
A Survey of Computer Graphics  

- .-  
Figure 1-50  
A color-coded plot with 16 million density points of relative brightness  
ob~t?~ed for the Whirlpool Nebula reveals two distinct galaxies.  
(Courtesy of Lar AIam National Laboratory.)  
- -  
Figure 1-51 Figurn 1-52  
Mathematical curve functiow Lighting effects and surface plotted in various color rendering techniqws were applied  
combinations. (Courtesy ofMeluin L. to produce this surface  
Prun'tt, Los Alamos National representation for a three Laboratory.) dimensional funhon. (Courtesy of  
Wfmm hmh, Inc, The hfaker of  
Mathmurtica.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
dures using quaternions generated the object shown in Fig. 1-53, and a topologi- 1-6  
cal shucture is displayed in Fig. 1-54. Scientists are also developing methods for wsualization  
visualizing general classes of data. Figure 1-55 shows a general technique for  
graphing and modeling data distributed over a spherical surface.  
A few of the many other visualization applications are shown in Figs. 1-56  
through 149. These figk show airflow ove? ihe surface of a space shuttle, nu 
merical modeling of thunderstorms, study of aack propagation in metals, a  
colorcoded plot of fluid density over an airfoil, a cross-sectional slicer for data  
sets, protein modeling, stereoscopic viewing of molecular structure, a model of  
the ocean floor, a Kuwaiti oil-fire simulation, an air-pollution study, a com-grow 
ing study, rrconstruction of Arizona's Cham CanY& tuins, and a-graph ofauto 
mobile accident statistics.  
-  
Figure 1-53  
A four-dimensional object  
projected into three 
dimensional space, then  
projected to a video monitor,  
and color coded. The obpct  
was generated using  
quaternions and fractal  
squaring procedm, with an  
Want subtracted to show the  
complex Julia set. (Crmrtrsy of  
Iohn C. Ifart, School of  
Electrical Enginem'ng d  
Computer Science, Washingfon  
State Uniwrsity.)  
Figure 1 -54  
Four views from a real-time,  
interactive computer-animation  
study of minimal surface ("snails")  
in the 3- sphere projected to three 
dimensional Euclidean space.  
(Courtesy of George Francis,  
Deprtmmt of Mathtics ad the  
Natwnal Colter for Sup~rromputing  
Applications, University of Illinois at  
UrhnaChampaign. Copyright O  
1993.) -  
F+pre 1-55  
A method for graphing and  
modeling data distributed over a  
spherical surface. (Courfesy of Greg  
Nielson. Computer Science  
Department, Arizona State  
University.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Cjlapter 1  
A Survey of Computer Graphics  

Figure 1-56  
A visualization of &eam surfaces  
flowing past a space shuttle by Jeff  
Hdtquist and Eric Raible, NASA  
Ames. (Courtlsy of Sam Wton,  
NASA Amcs Raaadr Cnrtlr.)  
Figure 1-57  
Numerical model of airflow inside  
a thunderstorm. (Cmtrtsv of Bob  
Figure 2-58  
Numerical model of the surface of a  
thunderstorm. (Courtsy of Sob  
Wilklmsbn, Lkprhnmt of  
Atmospheric Sciences and tk NatiaMl  
Center lor Supercomputing  
Applications, Unimmity ofnlinois at  
Urbana-Champrip.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
-- --  Figure 1-59  
Colorded visualization of stress  
energy density in a crack 
propagation study for metal plates,  
modeled by Bob Haber. (Courfesy of  
tk Natioml Cinter for  
Supercaputmg Applicutions,  
Unmity of nli~is at Urbrmn 
Chnmpa~gn.)  

Figure 1-60  
A fluid dynamic simulation,  
showing a color-coded plot of fluid  
density over a span of grid planes  
around an aircraft wing, developed  
by Lee-Hian Quek, John  
Eickerneyer, and Jeffery Tan.  
(Courtesy of the Infinnation  
Technology Institute, Republic of  
Singapore.)  



F@w 1-61  
Commercial slicer-dicer software,  showing color-coded data values  over awsedional slices of a data  set. (Courtesy of Spyglnss, Im.)  
Fipm 1-62  
Visualization of a protein structure  
by Jay Siege1 and Kim Baldridge,  
SDSC. (Courfesy of Stephnnie Sides,  
San Diego Supercomputer Cmter.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 

Figure 1 -63  
Stereoscopic viewing of a molecular strumup using a "boom" device.  
(Courtesy of the Nafiaal Centerfir Supermputing Applhtions, Univmity  
of Illinois at UrbomChnmprign.)  


Figure 1-64  
One image from a stendqnc pair,  showing a visualization of the  ocean floor obtained from mteltik  data, by David Sandwell and Chris  Small, Scripps Institution of Ocean ography, and Jim Mdeod, SDSC.  (Courtesy of Stephanie Sids, Sun  Diego Supramrputer Center.)  
Figvne 165  
A simulation of the effds of the  Kuwaiti oil fire, by Gary  
Glatpneier, Chuck Hanson, and  Paul Hinker. ((Courtesy of Mike  Kmzh, Adrnnced Computing  lnboratwy 41 Los Alrrmos Nafionul  hbomtwy.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in

-1 -----7 - I '1  
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Section 1-6  
Visualization  


Figure 1-66  
A visualization of pollution over  the earth's surface by Tom Palmer,  Cray Research Inc./NCSC; Chris  Landreth, NCSC; and Dave W,  NCSC. Pollutant SO, is plotted as a  blue surface, acid-rain deposition is  a color plane on the map surface,  and rain concentration is shown as  clear cylinders. (Courtesy of the  
North Cnmlim Supercomputing  
Center/MCNC.)  
- -. -  Figure 1-68  
A visualization of the  
reconstruction of the ruins at Cham  Canyon, Arizona. (Courtesy of  
Melvin L. Pnceitt, Los Alamos  
Nationul lnboratory. Data supplied by  Stephen If. Lekson.)  
Figure 1-67  
One frame of an animation  
sequence showing the development  
of a corn ear. (Couitcsy of tk  
National Center for Supmomputing  
Applimhs, Unimity ofnlinois at  
UrhnaChampaign.)  

Figure 1-69  
A prototype technique, called  
WinVi, for visualizing tabular  
multidimensional data is used here  
to correlate statistical information  
on pedestrians involved in  
automobile accidents, developed by  
a visuahzation team at ITT.  
(Courtesy of Lee-Hian Quek,  
Infonnatwn Technology Institute.  
Republic of Singapore.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
Although methods used in computer graphics and Image processing overlap, the  
amas am concerned with fundamentally different operations. In computer  
graphics, a computer is used to create a pichue. Image processing, on the other  
hand. applies techniques to modify or interpret existing pibures, such as phe  
tographs and TV scans. Two principal applications of image pmcessing are (1)  
improving picture quality and (2) machine perception of visual information, as  
used in robotics.  
To apply imageprocessing methods, we first digitize a photograph or other  
picture into an image file. Then digital methods can be applied to rearrange pic 
ture parts, to enhance color separations, or to improve the quality of shading. An  
example of the application of imageprocessing methods to enhance the quality  
of a picture is shown in Fig. 1-70. These techniques are used extensively in com 
mercial art applications that involve the retouching and rearranging of sections  
of photographs and other artwork. Similar methods are used to analyze satellite  
photos of the earth and photos of galaxies.  
Medical applications also make extensive use of imageprocessing tech 
niques for picture enhancements, in tomography and in simulations of opera 
tions. Tomography is a technique of X-ray photography that allows cross-sec 
tional views of physiological systems to be displayed. Both computed X-rav  
tomography (CT) and position emission tomography (PET) use propchon methods to  
reconstruct cross sections from digital data. These techniques are also used to  

.- -.  
figure 1-70  
A blurred photograph of a license plate becomes legible after  
the application of imageprocessing techniques. (Courtesy of  
Los Alamos National Laboratory.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
monitor internal functions and show crcss sections during surgery. Other me& ~~ 1-7  
ical imaging techniques include ultrasonics and nudear medicine scanners. With Image Pm&ng  ultrasonics, high-frequency sound waves, instead of X-rays, are used to generate  
digital data. Nuclear medicine scanners colled di@tal data from radiation emit 
ted from ingested radionuclides and plot colorcoded images.  
lmage processing and computer graphics are typically combined in  
many applications. Medicine, for example, uses these techniques to model and  
study physical functions, to design artificial limbs, and to plan and practice  
surgery. The last application is generally referred to as computer-aided surgery.  
Two-dimensional cross sections of the body are obtained using imaging tech 
niques. Then the slices are viewed and manipulated using graphics methods to  
simulate actual surgical procedures and to try out different surgical cuts. Exam 
ples of these medical applications are shown in Figs. 1-71 and 1-72.  

Figure 1-71  
One frame from a computer  
animation visualizing cardiac  
activation levels within  
regions of a semitransparent  
volume rendered dog heart.  
Medical data provided by  
Wiiam Smith, Ed Simpson,  
and G. Allan Johnson, Duke  
University. Image-rendering  
software by Tom Palmer,  
Cray Research, Inc./NCSC.  
(Courtesy of Dave Bock, North  
Carolina Supercomputing  
CenterlMCNC.) Figure 1-72  
One image from a stereoscopic pair  
showing the bones of a human  
hand. The images were rendered by  
lnmo Yoon, D. E. Thompson, and  
W. N. Waggempack, Jr;, LSU, from  
a data set obtained with CT scans  
by Rehabilitation Research,  
GWLNHDC. These images show a  
possible tendon path for  
reconstructive surgery. (Courtesy of  
IMRLAB, Mechnniwl Engineering,  
Louisiow State Uniwsity.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Chapter 1 14  
ASuNe~ofComputerCraphics GRAPHICAL USER INTERFACES  
It is common now for software packages to provide a graphical interface. A  
major component of a graphical interface is a window manager that allows a user  
. to display multiple-window areas. Each window can contain a different process  
that can contain graphical or nongraphical displays. To make a particular win 
dow active, we simply click in that window using an interactive pointing dcvicc.  
Interfaces also display menus and icons for fast selection of processing op 
tions or parameter values. An icon is a graphical symbol that is designed to look  
like the processing option it represents. The advantages of icons are that they  
take up less screen space than corresponding textual descriptions and they can be  
understood more quickly if well designed. Menbs contain lists of textual descrip 
tions and icons.  
Figure 1-73 illustrates a typical graphical mterface, containing a window  
manager, menu displays, and icons. In this example, the menus allow selection of  
processing options, color values, and graphics parameters. The icons represent  
options for painting, drawing, zooming, typing text strings, and other operations  
connected with picture construction.  

--  
Figure 1-73  
A graphical user interface, showing  
multiple window areas, menus, and  
icons. (Courtmy of Image-ln  
Grponrtion.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 


www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
D ue to the widespread recognition of the power and utility of computer  
graphics in virtually all fields, a broad range of graphics hardware and  
software systems is now available. Graphics capabilities for both two-dimen 
sional and three-dimensional applications ax now common on general-purpose  
computers, including many hand-held calculators. With personal computers, we  
can use a wide variety of interactive input devices and graphics software pack 
ages. For higherquality applications, we can choose from a number of sophisti 
cated special-purpose graphics hardware systems and technologies. In this chap  
ter, we explore the basic features of graphics hardwa~e components and graphics  
software packages.  
2-1  
VIDEO DISPLAY DEVICES  
Typically, the primary output device in a graphics system is a video monitor (Fig.  
2-1). The operation of most video monitors is based on the standard cathode-ray  
tube (CRT) design, but several other technologies exist and solid-state monitors  
may eventually predominate.  
- -- -  

rig~rrr 2-1  
A computer graphics workstation. (Courtrsyof Thir. Inc.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
Refresh Cathode-Ray Tubes  
Fipm 2-2 illustrates the basic operation of,a CRT. A beam of electrons (cathode  rays), emitted by an electron gun, passes through focusing and deflection systems  that direct the beam toward specified positions on the phosphomted screen.  The phosphor then emits a small spot of light at each position contacted by the  electron beam. Because the light emitted by the phosphor fades very rapidly,  some method is needed for maintaining the screen picture. One way to keep the  phosphor glowing is to redraw the picture repeatedly by quickly directing the  electron beam back over the same points. This type of display is called a refresh  CRT.  
The primary components of an electron gun in a CRT are the heated metal  cathode and a control grid (Fig. 2-31. Heat is supplied to the cathode by direding  a current through a coil of wire, called the filament, inside the cylindrical cathode  structure. This causes electrons to be 'kiled off" the hot cathode surface. In the  vacuum inside the CRT envelope, the free, negatively charged electrons are then  accelerated toward the phosphor coating by a high positive voltage. The acceler 
Magnetic  
Deflection Coils Phosphor- Focusina Coated  
Screen  
Electron  
Connector Elrnron a !. .'k Beam  
- --  
Figure 2-2  
Basic design of a magneticdeflection CRT.  
Electron  
kction 2-1  
Vkh Display Devices  


-  
Figure 2-3  
Focusing  
Cathode Anode  I  
Beam  Path  

Operation of an electron gun with an accelerating anode.  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Chapter 2 ating voltage can be generated with a positively charged metal coating on the in 
overview of Graphics Systems side of the CRT envelope near the phosphor screen, or an accelerating anode can  be used, as in Fig. 2-3. Sometimes the electron gun is built to contain the acceler 
ating anode and focusing system within the same unit.  
Intensity of the electron beam is controlled by setting voltage levels on the  
control grid, which is a metal cylinder that fits over the cathode. A high negative  
voltage applied to the control grid will shut off the beam by repelling eledrons  
and stopping them from passing through the small hole at the end of the control  
grid structure. A smaller negative voltage on the control grid simply decreases  
the number of electrons passing through. Since the amount of light emitted by  
the phosphor coating depends on the number of electrons striking the screen, we  
control the brightness of a display by varying the voltage on the control grid. We  
specify the intensity level for individual screen positions with graphics software  
commands, as discussed in Chapter 3.  
The focusing system in a CRT is needed to force the electron beam to con 
verge into a small spot as it strikes the phosphor. Otherwise, the electrons would  
repel each other, and the beam would spread out as it approaches the screen. Fo 
cusing is accomplished with either electric or magnetic fields. Electrostatic focus 
ing is commonly used in television and computer graphics monitors. With elec 
trostatic focusing, the elwtron beam passes through a positively charged metal  
cylinder that forms an electrostatic lens, as shown in Fig. 2-3. The action of the  
electrostatic lens fdcuses the electron beam at the center of the screen, in exactly  
the same way that an optical lens focuses a beam of hght at a particular focal dis 
tance. Similar lens focusing effects can be accomplished with a magnetic field set  
up by a coil mounted around the outside of the CRT envelope. Magnetic lens fc 
cusing produces the smallest spot size on the screen and is used in special 
purpose devices.  
Additional focusing hardware is used in high-precision systems to keep the  
beam in focus at all mn positions. The distance that thc electron beam must  
travel to different points on the screen varies because thc radius of curvature for  
most CRTs is greater than the distance from the focusing system to the screen  
center. Therefore, the electron beam will be focused properly only at the center ot  
the screen. As the beam moves to the outer edges of the screen, displayed images  
become blurred. To compensate for this, the system can adjust the focusing ac 
cording to the screen position of the beam.  
As with focusing, deflection of the electron beam can be controlled either  
with electric fields or with magnetic fields. Cathode-ray tubes are now commonl!.  
constructed with magnetic deflection coils mounted on the outside of the CRT  
envelope, as illustrated in Fig. 2-2. Two pairs of coils are used, with the coils in  
each pair mounted on opposite sides of the neck of the CRT envelope. One pair is  
mounted on the top and bottom of the neck, and the other pair is mounted on  
opposite sides of the neck. The magnetic, field produced by each pair of coils re 
sults in a transverse deflection force that is perpendicular both to the direction of  
the magnetic field and to the direction of travel of the electron beam. Horizontal  
deflection is accomplished with one pair of coils, and vertical deflection by the  
other pair. The proper deflection amounts are attained by adjusting the current  
through the coils. When electrostatic deflection is used, two pairs of parallel  
plates are mounted inside the CRT envelope. One pair oi plates is mounted hori 
zontally to control the vertical deflection, and the other pair is mounted verticall!.  
to control horizontal deflection (Fig. 2-4).  
Spots of light are produced on the screen by the transfer of the CRT beam  
energy to the phosphor. When the electrons in the beam collide with the phos 
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
Ven~cal  
Focusing Deflection  
Phosphor Coated  
Screen  
Electron  

Connector Elr-,:wn ticr~zontal Beam  Pins Gun De!lection  
Plates  
Figure 2-4  
Electmstatic deflection of the electron beam in a CRT.  
phor coating, they are stopped and thek kinetic energy is absorbed by the phos phor. Part of the beam energy is converted by friction into heat energy, and the  remainder causes electrons in the phosphor atoms to move up to higher quan tum-energy levels. After a short time, the "excited phosphor electrons begin  dropping back to their stable ground state, giving up their extra energy as small  quantums of Light energy. What we see on the screen is the combined effect of all  the electron light emissions: a glowing spot that quickly fades after all the excited  phosphor electrons have returned to their ground energy level. The frequency (or  color) of the light emitted by the phosphor is proportional to the energy differ 
ence between the excited quantum state and the ground state.  Different hnds of phosphors are available for use in a CRT. Besides color, a  mapr difference between phosphors is their persistence: how long they continue  to emit light (that is, have excited electrons returning to the ground state) after  the CRT beam is removed. Persistence is defined as the time it takes the emitted  light from the screen to decay to one-tenth of its original intensity. Lower persistence phosphors require higher refresh rates to maintain a picture on the  screen without flicker. A phosphor with low persistence is useful for animation; a  high-persistence phosphor is useful for displaying highly complex, static pic tures. Although some phosphors have a persistence greater than 1 second, graph ics monitors are usually constructed with a persistence in the range from 10 to 60  microseconds.  
Figure 2-5 shows the intensity distribution of a spot on the screen. The in tensity is greatest at the center of the spot, and decreaws with a Gaussian distrib ution out to the edges of the spot. This distribution corresponds to the mss sectional electron density distribution of the CRT beam. '  
The maximum number of points that can be displayed without overlap on a  CRT is referred to as the resolution. A more precise definition of m!ution is the  number of points per centimeter that can be plotted horizontally and vertically,  although it is often simply stated as the total number of points in each direction.  Spot intensity has a Gaussian distribution (Fig. 2-5), so two adjacent spok will  appear distinct as long as their separation is greater than the diameter at which  each spot has an intensity of about 60 percent of that at the center of the spot.  This overlap position is illustrated in Fig. 2-6. Spot size also depends on intensity.  As more electrons are accelerated toward the phospher per second, the CRT  beam diameter and the illuminated spot increase. In addition, the increased exci tation energy tends to spread to neighboring phosphor atoms not directly in the  
Fipn 2-5  
Intensity distribution of an  
illuminated phosphor spot on a CRT screen.  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Chrpcer 2  
Overview of Graphics Sptems  
Figure 2-6  
Two illuminated phosphor  
spots are distinguishable  
when their separation is  
greater than the diameter at  
which a spot intensity has  
fallen to 60 percent of  
maximum.  
path of the beam, which further increases the spot diameter. Thus, resolution of a  CRT is dependent on the type of phosphor, the intensity to be displayed, and the  focusing and deflection systems. Typical resolution on high-quality systems is  1280 by 1024, with higher resolutions available on many systems. High 
resolution systems are often referred to as high-definition systems. The physical  size of a graphics monitor is given as the length of the screen diagonal, with sizes  varying from about 12 inches to 27 inches or more. A CRT monitor can be at tached to a variety of computer systems, so the number of screen points that can  actually be plotted depends on the capabilities of the system to which it is at tached.  
Another property of video monitors is aspect ratio. This number gives the  ratio of vertical points to horizontal points necessary to produce equal-length  lines in both directions on the screen. (Sometimes aspect ratio is stated in terms of  the ratio of horizontal to vertical points.) An aspect ratio of 3/4 means that a ver tical line plotted with three points has the same length as a horizontal line plot ted with four points.  
Raster-Scan Displays  
The most common type of graphics monitor employing a CRT is the raster-scan  display, based on television technology. In a raster-scan system, the electron  beam is swept across the screen, one row at a time from top to bottom. As the  eledron beam moves across each row, the beam intensity is turned on and off to  create a pattern of illuminated spots. Picture definition is stored in a memory  area called the refresh buffer or frame buffer. This memory area holds the set of  intensity values for all the screen points. Stored intensity values are then re trieved from the refresh buffer and "painted" on the screen one row (scan line) at  a time (Fig. 2-7). Each screen point is referred to as a pixel or pel (shortened  fonns of picture element). The capability of a raster-scan system to store inten 
sity information for each screen point makes it well suited for the realistic displav  of scenes containing subtle shading and color patterns. Home television sets and  printers are examples of other systems using raster-scan methods.  
intensity range for pixel positions depends on the capability of the raster  system. In a simple black-and-white system, each screen point is either on or off,  so only one bit per pixel is needed to control the intensity of screen positions. For  a bilevel system, a bit value of 1 indicates that the electron beam is to be turn4  on at that position, and a value of 0 indicates that the beam intensity is to be off.  Additional bits are needed when color and intensity variations can be displayed.  Up to 24 bits per pixel are included in high-quality systems, which can require  severaI megabytes of storage for the frame buffer, depending on the resolution of  the system. A system with 24 bits per pixel and a screen resolution of 1024 bv  1024 requires 3 megabytes of storage for the frame buffer. On a black-and-white  system with one bit per pixeI, the frame buffer is commonly called a bitmap. For  systems with multiple bits per pixel, the frame buffer is Aten referred to as a  pixmap.  
Refreshing on raster-scan displays is carried out at the rate of 60 to 80  frames per second, although some systems are designed for higher refresh rates.  Sometimes, refresh rates are described in units of cycles per second, or Hertz  (Hz), where a cycle corresponds to one frame. Using these units, we would de 
scribe a refresh rate of 60 frames per second as simply 60 Hz. At the end of each  scan line, the electron beam returns to the left side of the screen to begin displav ing the next scan line. The return to the left of the screen, after refreshing each  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 



Figure 2-7  
A raster-scan system displays an object as a set of dismte points across  
each scan line.  
scan line, is called the horizontal retrace of the electron beam. And at the end of  
each frame (displayed in 1/80th to 1/60th of a second), the electron beam returns  
(vertical retrace) to the top left comer of the screen to begin the next frame.  
On some raster-scan systems (and in TV sets), each frame is displayed in  
two passes using an interlaced refresh pmedure. In the first pass, the beam  
sweeps across every other scan line fmm top to bottom. Then after the vertical re 
trace, the beam sweeps out the remaining scan lines (Fig. 2-8). Interlacing of the  
scan lines in this way allows us to see the entire smn displayed in one-half the  
time it would have taken to sweep amss all the lines at once fmm top to bottom.  
Interlacing is primarily used with slower refreshing rates. On an older, 30 frame 
per-second, noninterlaced display, for instance, some flicker is noticeable. But  
with interlacing, each of the two passes can be accomplished in 1/60th of a sec 
ond, which brings the refresh rate nearer to 60 frames per second. This is an effec 
tive technique for avoiding flicker, providing that adjacent scan lines contain sim 
ilar display information.  
Random-Scan Displays  
When operated as a random-scan display unit, a CRT has the electron beam di 
rected only to the parts of the screen where a picture is to be drawn. Random 
scan monitors draw a picture one line at a time and for this reason are also re 
ferred to as vector displays (or stroke-writing or calligraphic diisplays). The  
component lines of a picture can be drawn and refreshed by a random-scan sys 
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Chapter 2  
Overview of Graphics Systems  
Figure 2-8  
Interlacing scan lines on a raster 
scan display. First, all points on the  
wen-numbered (solid) scan lines 
are displayed; then all points along  
the odd-numbered (dashed) lines  
are displayed.  
tem in any specified order (Fig. 2-9). A pen plotter operates in a similar way and  
is an example of a random-scan, hard-copy device.  
Refresh rate on a random-scan system depends on the number of lines to be  
displayed. Picture definition is now stored as a set of linedrawing commands in  
an area of memory refed to as the refresh display file. Sometimes the refresh  
display file is called the display list, display program, or simply the refresh  
buffer. To display a specified picture, the system cycles through the set of com 
mands in the display file, drawing each component line in turn. After all line 
drawing commands have been processed, the system cycles back to the first line  
command in the list. Random-scan displays arr designed to draw all the compo 
nent lines of a picture 30 to 60 times each second. Highquality vector systems are  
capable of handling approximately 100,000 "short" lines at this refresh rate.  
When a small set of lines is to be displayed, each rrfresh cycle is delayed to avoid  
refresh rates greater than 60 frames per second. Otherwise, faster refreshing oi  
the set of lines could bum out the phosphor.  
Random-scan systems are designed for linedrawing applications and can 
not display realistic shaded scenes. Since pidure definition is stored as a set of  
linedrawing instructions and not as a set of intensity values for all screen points,  
vector displays generally have higher resolution than raster systems. Also, vector  
displays produce smooth line drawings because the CRT beam directly follows  
the line path. A raster system, in contrast, produces jagged lines that are plotted  
as dhte point sets.  
Color CRT Monitors  
A CRT monitor displays color pictures by using a combination of phosphors that  
emit different-colored light. By combining the emitted light from the different  
phosphors, a range of colors can be generated. The two basic techniques for pro 
ducing color displays with a CRT are the beam-penetration method and the  
shadow-mask method.  
The beam-penetration method for displaying color pictures has been used  
with random-scan monitors. Two layers of phosphor, usually red and green, are  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 



Figure 2-9  
A random-scan system draws the component lines of an object in any  
order specified.  
coated onto the inside of the CRT screen, and the displayed color depends on  
how far the electron beam penetrates into the phosphor layers. A beam of slow  
electrons excites only the outer red layer. A beam of very fast electrons penetrates  
through the red layer and excites the inner green layer. At intermediate beam  
speeds, combinations of red and green light are emitted to show two additional  
colors, orange and yellow. The speed of the electrons, and hence the screen color  
at any point, is controlled by the beam-acceleration voltage. Beam penetration  
has been an inexpensive way to produce color in random-scan monitors, but only  
four colors are possible, and the quality of pictures is not as good as with other  
methods.  
Shadow-mask methods are commonly used in rasterscan systems (includ 
ing color TV) because they produce a much wider range of colors than the beam 
penetration method. A shadow-mask CRT has three phosphor color dots at each  
pixel position. One phosphor dot emits a red light, another emifs a green light,  
and the third emits a blue light. This type of CRT has three electron guns, one for  
each color dot, and a shadow-mask grid just behind the phosphor-coated screen.  
Figure 2-10 illustrates the deltadelta shadow-mask method, commonly used in  
color CRT systems. The three electron beams are deflected and focused as a  
group onto the shadow mask, which contains a series of holes aligned with the  
phosphor-dot patterns. When the three beams pass through a hole in the shadow  
mask, they activate a dot triangle, which appears as a small color spot on the  
screen. The phosphor dots in the triangles are arranged so that each electron  
beam can activate only its corresponding color dot when it passes through the  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
Chapter 2  
Overview of Graphics Systems  
Elearon  
Guns  
I Magnified  
I Phos~hor-Do1 
' Trtsngle  
Figure 2-10  
Operation of a delta-delta, shadow-mask CRT. Three electron  
guns, aligned with the triangular colordot patterns on the screen,  
are directed to each dot triangle by a shadow mask.  
shadow mask. Another configuration for the three electron guns is an in-line  arrangement in which the three electron guns, and the corresponding  red-green-blue color dots on the screen, are aligned along one scan line instead  of in a triangular pattern. This in-line arrangement of electron guns is easier to  keep in alignment and is commonly used in high-resolution color CRTs.  
We obtain color variations in a shadow-mask CRT by varying the intensity  levels of the three electron beams. By turning off the red and green guns, we get  only the color coming hm the blue phosphor. Other combinations of beam in tensities produce a small light spot for each pixel position, since our eyes tend to  merge the three colors into one composite. The color we see depends on the  amount of excitation of the red, green, and blue phosphors. A white (or gray)  
area is the result of activating all three dots with equal intensity. Yellow is pro duced with the green and red dots only, magenta is produced with the blue and  red dots, and cyan shows up when blue and green are activated equally. In some  low-cost systems, the electron beam can only be set to on or off, limiting displays  to eight colors. More sophisticated systems can set intermediate intensity levels  
for the electron beams, allowing several million different colors to be generated.  Color graphics systems can be designed to be used with several types of  CRT display devices. Some inexpensive home-computer systems and video  games are designed for use with a color TV set and an RF (radio-muency) mod ulator. The purpose of the RF mCdulator is to simulate the signal from a broad cast TV station. This means that the color and intensity information of the picture  must be combined and superimposed on the broadcast-muen* carrier signal  that the TV needs to have as input. Then the cirmitry in the TV takes this signal  from the RF modulator, extracts the picture information, and paints it on the  screen. As we might expect, this extra handling of the picture information by the  RF modulator and TV circuitry decreases the quality of displayed images.  Composite monitors are adaptations of TV sets that allow bypass of the  broadcast circuitry. These display devices still require that the picture informa 
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
tion be combined, but no carrier signal is needed. Picture information is com- Mion 2-1  
bined into a composite signal and then separated by the monitor, so the resulting Video Display Devices  picture quality is still not the best attainable.  
Color CRTs in graphics systems are designed as RGB monitors. These mon 
itors use shadow-mask methods and take the intensity level for each electron gun  
(red, green, and blue) directly from the computer system without any intennedi 
ate processing. High-quality raster-graphics systems have 24 bits per pixel in the  
kame buffer, allowing 256 voltage settings for each electron gun and nearly 17  
million color choices for each pixel. An RGB color system with 24 bits of storage  
per pixel is generally referred to as a full-color system or a true-color system.  
Direct-View Storage Tubes  
An alternative method for maintaining a screen image is to store the picture in 
formation inside the CRT instead of refreshing the screen. A direct-view storage  
tube (DVST) stores the picture information as a charge distribution just behind  
the phosphor-coated screen. Two electron guns are used in a DVST. One, the pri 
mary gun, is used to store the picture pattern; the second, the flood gun, main 
tains the picture display.  
A DVST monitor has both disadvantages and advantages compared to the  
refresh CRT. Because no refreshing is needed, very complex pidures can be dis 
played at very high resolutions without flicker. Disadvantages of DVST systems  
are that they ordinarily do not display color and that selected parts of a picture  
cannot he erased. To eliminate a picture section, the entire screen must be erased  
and the modified picture redrawn. The erasing and redrawing process can take  
several seconds for a complex picture. For these reasons, storage displays have  
been largely replaced by raster systems.  
Flat-Panel Displays  
Although most graphics monitors are still constructed with CRTs, other technolo 
gies are emerging that may soon replace CRT monitc~rs. The term Bat-panel dis 
play refers to a class of video devices that have reduced volume, weight, and  
power requirements compared to a CRT. A significant feature of flat-panel dis 
plays is that they are thinner than CRTs, and we can hang them on walls or wear  
them on our wrists. Since we can even write on some flat-panel displays, they  
will soon be available as pocket notepads. Current uses for flat-panel displays in 
clude small TV monitors, calculators, pocket video games, laptop computers,  
armrest viewing of movies on airlines, as advertisement boards in elevators, and  
as graphics displays in applications requiring rugged, portable monitors.  
We can separate flat-panel displays into two categories: emissive displays  
and nonemissive displays. The emissive displays (or emitters) are devices that  
convert electrical energy into light. Plasma panels, thin-film electroluminescent  
displays, and Light-emitting diodes are examples of emissive displays. Flat CRTs  
have also been devised, in which electron beams arts accelerated parallel to the  
screen, then deflected 90' to the screen. But flat CRTs have not proved to be as  
successful as other emissive devices. Nonemmissive displays (or nonemitters)  
use optical effects to convert sunlight or light from some other source into graph 
ics patterns. The most important example of a nonemisswe flat-panel display is a  
liquid-crystal device.  
Plasma panels, also called gas-discharge displays, are constructed by fill 
ing the region between two glass plates with a mixture of gases that usually in 
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
Chapter 2 dudes neon. A series of vertical conducting ribbons is placed on one glass panel,  Overview dGraphics Systems and a set of horizontal ribbons is built into the other glass panel (Fig. 2-11). Firing  voltages applied to a pair of horizontal and vertical conductors cause the gas at  
the intersection of the two conductors to break down into a glowing plasma of  
elecbons and ions. Picture definition is stored in a refresh buffer, and the firing  
voltages are applied to refresh the pixel positions (at the intersections of the con 
ductors) 60 times per second. Alternahng-t methods are used to provide  
faster application of the firing voltages, and thus bnghter displays. Separation  
between pixels is provided by the electric field of the conductors. Figure 2-12  
shows a highdefinition plasma panel. One disadvantage of plasma panels has  
been that they were strictly monochromatic devices, but systems have been de 
veloped that are now capable of displaying color and grayscale.  
Thin-film electroluminescent displays are similar in construction to a  
plasma panel. The diffemnce is that the region between the glass plates is filled  
with a phosphor, such as zinc sulfide doped with manganese, instead of a gas  
(Fig. 2-13). When a suffiaently high voltage is applied to a pair of crossing elec 
trodes, the phosphor becomes a conductor in the area of the intersection of the  
two electrodes. Electrical energy is then absorbed by the manganese atoms,  
which then release the energy as a spot of light similar to the glowing plasma ef 
fect in a plasma panel. Electroluminescent displays require more power than  
plasma panels, and good color and gray scale displays are hard to achieve.  
A third type of emissive device is the light-emitting diode (LED). A matrix  
of diodes is arranged to form the pixel positions in the display, and picture defin 
ition is stored in a refresh buffer. As in xan-line refreshing of a CRT, information  


Figure 2-11  
Basic design of a plasma-panel  display device.  
Figure 2-12  
A plasma-panel display with a  
resolution of 2048 by 2048 and a  
screen diagonal of 1.5 meters.  
(Courtesy of Photonics Systons.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 

Figure 2-13  
Basic design of a thin-film  
electroluminescent display device.  
is read from the refresh buffer and converted to voltage levels that are applied to  the  
diodes  
to produce the light  
patterns  
Mion 2-1  
Vldeo Display Devices  
- 

~i~uid&ystal  
in  
are  
the display.  

displays  
(LCDS)  
commonly  
in small systems, such  

as  
calculators  
(Fig.  
2-14)  
and  
portable,  
laptop  
used  
computers (Fig.  
2-15). These  
non-  

emissive devices  
produce  
a picture  
by  
passing polarized  
light  
from the  
surround 

ings or from an internal light sow through a liquid-aystal material that can be  
aligned to either block or transmit the light.  
The term liquid crystal refers to the fact that these compounds have a crys 
talline arrangement of molecules, yet they flow like a liquid. Flat-panel displays  
commonly use nematic (threadlike) liquid-crystal compounds that tend to keep  
the long axes of the rod-shaped molecules aligned. A flat-panel display can then  
be constructed with a nematic liquid crystal, as demonstrated in Fig. 2-16. Two  
glass plates, each containing a light polarizer at right angles to the-other plate,  
sandwich the liquid-crystal material. Rows of horizontal transparent conductors  
are built into one glass plate, and columns of vertical conductors are put into the  
other plate. The intersection of two conductors defines a pixel position. Nor 
mally, the molecules are aligned as shown in the "on state" of Fig. 2-16. Polarized  
light passing through the material is twisted so that it will pass through the op 
posite polarizer. The light is then mfleded back to the viewer. To turn off the  
pixel, we apply a voltage to the two intersecting conductors to align the mole  
cules so that the light is not .twisted. This type of flat-panel device is referred to as  
a passive-matrix LCD. Picture definitions are stored in a refresh buffer, and the Figure2-14  screen is refreshed at the rate of 60 frames per second, as in the emissive devices. A hand calculator with an  Back lighting is also commonly applied using solid-state electronic devices, so (Courtes~of Exus  that the system is not completely dependent on outside light soufies. Colors can 1N'"ment5.)  be displayed by using different materials or dyes and by placing a triad of color  
pixelsat each &reen location. Another method for conskctingk13s is to place  
a transistor at each pixel location, using thin-film transistor technology. The tran 
sistors are used to control the voltage at pixel locations and to prevent charge  
from gradually leaking out of the liquid-crystal cells. These devices are called  
active-matrix displays.  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 

Figun 2-15  
A backlit, passivematrix, liquid 
crystal display in a Laptop  
computer, featuring 256 colors, a  
screen resolution of 640 by 400, and  
a saeen diagonal of 9 inches.  (Caurtesy of Applc Computer, Inc.)  

Fipe 2-16  
The light-twisting, shutter effect used in the design of most liquid 
crystal display devices.  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Three-Dimensional Viewing Devices Section 2-1  Video Dtsplay Devices Graphics monitors for the display of three-dimensional scenes have been devised  using a technique that reflects a CRT image from a vibrating, flexible mirror. The  
operation of such a system is demonstrated in Fig. 2-17. As the varifocal mirror  
vibrates, it changes focal length. These vibrations are synchronized with the dis 
play of an object on a CRT so that each point on the object is reflected from the  
mirror into a spatial position corresponding to the distance of that point from a  
specified viewing position. This allows us to walk around an object or scene and  
view it from different sides.  
Figure 2-18 shows the Genisco SpaceCraph system, which uses a vibrating  
mirror to project three-dimensional objects into a 25cm by 2h by 25- vol 
ume. This system is also capable of displaying two-dimensional cross-sectional  
"slices" of objects selected at different depths. Such systems have been used in  
medical applications to analyze data fmm ulhasonography and CAT scan de 
vices, in geological applications to analyze topological and seismic data, in de 
sign applications involving solid objects, and in three-dimensional simulations of  
systems, such as molecules and terrain.  

-. I-& Vibrating Flsxible Mirror  


-,-. I  

Figure 2-1 7 P  
+ation of a three-dimensional display system using a  
vibrating mirror that changes focal length to match the depth of  
points in a scene. D.  
Figure 2-16  
The SpaceCraph interactive  
graphics system displays objects in  
three dimensions using a vibrating,  
flexible mirror. (Courtesy of Genixo  
Compufm Corpornlion.)  
49  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Chapter 2 Stereoscopic and Virtual-Reality Systems  
Overview of Graphics Systems Another technique for representing tbdimensional objects is displaying  stereoscopic views. This method dws not produce hue three-dimensional im 
ages, but it does provide a three-dimensional effect by presenting a different  
view to each eye of an observer so that scenes do appear to have depth (Fig. 2-19).  
To obtain a stereoscopic proyxtion, we first need to obtain two views of a  
scene generated from. a yiewing direction corresponding to each eye (left and  
right). We can consma the two views as computer-generated scenes with differ 
ent viewing positions, or we can use a stem camera pair to photograph some  
object or scene. When we simultaneous look at the left view with the left eye and  
the right view with the right eye, the ~o views merge into a single image and  
we perceive a scene with depth. Figure 2-20 shows two views of a computer 
generated scene for stemgraphic pmpdiori. To increase viewing comfort, the  
areas at the left and right edges of !lG scene that are visible to only one eye have  
been eliminated.  

-- - .- -.  
Figrrrc 2-19  
Viewing a stereoscopic projection.  
(Courlesy of S1ered;mphics Corpomlion.)  

A stereoscopic viewing pair. (Courtesy ofjtny Farm.)  
50  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
One way to produce a stereoscopic effect is to display each of the two views Mion 2-1  
with a raster system on alternate refresh cycles. The sa~en is viewed through Mdeo Display Devices  glasses, with each lens designed to act as a rapidly alternating shutter that is syn 
chronized to block out one of the views. Figure 2-21 shows a pair of stereoscopic  
glasses constructed with liquidcrystal shutters and an infrared emitter that syn 
chronizes the glasses with the views on the screen.  
Stereoscopic viewing is also a component in virtual-reality systems,  
where users can step into a scene and interact with the environment. A headset  
(Fig. 2-22) containing an optical system to generate the stemxcopic views is  
commonly used in conjuction with interactive input devices to locate and manip  
date objects in the scene. A sensing system in the headset keeps track of the  
viewer's position, so that the front and back of objects can be m as the viewer  

Figure 2-21  
Glasses for viewing a stereoscopic scene and an  
infrared synchronizing emitter.  
(Courtesy of SfnroCraphics Copration.)  

~ . - --  
Figure 2-22  
A headset used in virtual-reality systems. (Coudrsy of Virtual  
RPsePrch.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Chapter 2  
Overview d Graphics Systems  
Figure 2-23  
Interacting with a virtual-reality environment. (Carrtq of tk  
Nahl Cmtrr~b Svprmmpvting Applbtioru, Unmrrsity of nlinois at  
UrboMCknrpngn.)  
"walks through" and interacts with the display. Figure 2-23 illustrates interaction  
with a virtual scene, using a headset and a data glove worn on the right hand  
(Section 2-5).  
An interactive virtual-reality environment can also be viewed with stereo 
scopic glasses and a video monitor, instead of a headset. This provides a means  
for obtaining a lowercost virtual-reality system. As an example, Fig. 2-24 shows  
an ultrasound tracking device with six degrees of freedom. The tracking device is  
placed on top of the video display and is used to monitor head movements so  
that the viewing position for a scene can be changed as head position changes.  

-  
Fipm 2-24  
An ultrasound tracking device used  
head position. ~~ of  
with Btereoscopic gbsses to track  
StrrmG* Corpmrrh.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
2-2 Sedion 2-2  
RASTER-SCAN SYSTEMS Raster-kan Systems  
Interactive raster graphics systems typically employ several processing units. In  
addition to the central pmessing unit, or CPU, a special-purpose processor,  
called the video controller or display controller, is used to control the operation  
of the display device. Organization of a simple raster system is shown in Fig. 2-25.  
Here, the frame buffer can be anywhere in the system memory, and the video  
controller accesses the frame buffer to refresh the screen. In addition to the video  
controller, more sophisticated raster systems employ other processors as co 
processors and accelerators to impIement various graphics operations.  
Video Controller  
Figure 2-26 shows a commonly used organization for raster systems. A fixed area  
of the system memory is reserved for the frame buffer, and the video controller is  
given direct access to the frame-buffer memory.  
Frarne-buffer locations, and the corresponding screen positions, are refer 
enced in Cartesian coordinates. For many graphics monitors, the coordinate ori 

Figure 2-25  
Architedure of a simple raster graphics system.  

Figure 2-26  
Wtectureof a raster system with a fixed portion of the system  
memory reserved for the frame buffer.  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
Chapter 2  
Owrview of Graphics Systems  

Figure 2-27  
The origin of the coordinate  system for identifying screen  positions is usually specified  in the lower-left corner.  
gin is'defined at the lower left screen comer (Fig. 2-27). The screen surface is then  represented as the first quadrant of a two-dimensional system, with positive x  values increasing to the right and positive y values increasing from bottom to  top. (On some personal computers, the coordinate origin is referenced at the  upper left comer of the screen, so the y values are inverted.) Scan lines are then  labeled from y, at the top of the screen to 0 at the bottom. Along each scan line,  screen pixel positions are labeled from 0 to x,,.  
In Fig. 2-28, the basic refresh operations of the video controller are dia grammed. Two registers are used to store the coordinates of the screen pixels. Ini tially, the x register is set to 0 and the y register is set to y,. The value stored in  the frame buffer for this pixel position is then retrieved and used to set the inten sity of the CRT beam. Then the x register is inrremented by 1, and the process re  peated for the next pixel on the top scan line. This procedure is repeated for each  pixel along the scan line. After the last pixel on the top scan line has been  processed, the x register is reset to 0 and the y register is decremented by 1. Pixels  along this scan line are then processed in turn, and the procedure is repeated for  each successive scan line. After cycling through all pixels along the bottom scan  line (y = O), the video controller resets the registers to the first pixel position on  the top scan line and the refresh process starts over.  
Since the screen must be refreshed at the rate of 60 frames per second, the  simple procedure illustrated in Fig. 2-28 cannot be accommodated by typical  RAM chips. The cycle time is too slow. To speed up pixel processing, video con trollers can retrieve multiple pixel values from the refresh bder on each pass.  The multiple pixel intensities are then stored in a separate register and used to  control the CRT beam intensity for a group of adjacent pixels. When that group  of pixels has been processed, the next block of pixel values is retrieved from the  frame buffer.  
A number of other operations can be performed by the video controller, be sides the basic refreshing operations. For various applications, the video con 

Figure 2-28  
Basic video-controller refresh operations.  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
- - - - . - - - --  Figiirc 2-29  


Architecture of a raster-graphics system with a display processor.  
troller can retrieve pixel intensities from different memory areas on different re 
fresh cycles. In highquality systems, for example, two hame buffers are often  
provided so that one buffer can be used for refreshing while the other is being  
filled with intensity values. Then the two buffers can switch roles. This provides  
a fast mechanism-for generating real-time animations, since different views of  
moving objects can be successively loaded inta the refresh buffers. Also, some  
transformations can be accomplished by the video controller. Areas of the screen  
can be enlarged, reduced, or moved from one location to another during the re 
fresh cycles. In addition, the video controller often contains a lookup table, so  
that pi;el values in the frame buffer are used to access the lookup tableinstead of  
controlling the CRT beam intensity directly. This provides a fast method for  
changing screen intensity values, and we discuss lookup tables in more detail in  
Chapter 4. Finally, some systems arr designed to allow the video controller to  
mix the frame-buffer image with an input image from a television camera or  
other input device.  
Raster-Scan Display Processor  
Figure 2-29 shows one way to set up the organization of a raster system contain 
ing a separate display processor, sometimes referred to as a graphics controller  
or a display coprocessor. The purpose of the display processor is to free the CPU  
from the graphics chores. In addition to the system memory, a separate display 
processor memory area can also be provided.  
A major task of the display pmcessor is digitizing a picture definition given ' - --I--  in an application program into a set of pixel-intensity values for storage in the  
frame buffer. This digitization process is caIled scan conversion. Graphics com- k'~llw 2-.30  mands specifying straight lines and other geometric objects are scan converted A character defined as a  into a set of discrete intensity points. Scan converting a straight-line segment, for rcctangu'ar grid of pixel  positions. example, means that we have to locate the pixel positions closest to the line path  and store the intensity for each position in the frame buffer. Similar methods are  
used for scan converting curved lines and polygon outlines. Characters can be  
defined with rectangular grids, as in Fig. 2-30, or they can be defined with curved 5 5  www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
outlines, as in Fig. 2-31. The array size for character grids can vary from about 5  
by 7 to 9 by 12 or more for higher-quality displays. A character grid is displayed  
by superimposing the rectangular grid pattern into the frame buffer at a specified  
coordinate position. With characters that are defined as curve outlines, character  
shapes are scan converted into the frame buffer.  
Display processors are also designed to perform a number of additional op 
erations. These functions include generating various line styles (dashed, dotted,  
or solid), displaying color areas, and performing certain transformations and ma 
nipulations on displayed objects. Also, display pmessors are typically designed  
to interface with interactive input devices, such as a mouse.  
Fiprr 2-3 I In an effort to reduce memory requirements in raster systems, methods  A character defined as a have been devised for organizing the frame buffer as a linked list and encoding  curve outline. the intensity information. One way to do this is to store each scan line as a set of  integer pairs. Orre number of each pair indicates an intensity value, and the sec 
ond number specifies the number of adjacent pixels on the scan line that are to  
have that intensity. This technique, called run-length encoding, ,can result in a  
considerable saving in storage space if a picture is to be constructed mostly with  
long runs of a single color each. A similar approach can be taken when pixel in 
tensities change linearly. Another approach is to encode the raster as a set of rec 
tangular areas (cell encoding). The aisadvantages of encoding runs are that in 
tensity changes are difficult to make and storage requirements actually increase  
as the length of the runs decreases. In addition, it is difficult for the display con 
troller to process the raster when many short runs are involved.  
2-3  
RANDOM-SCAN SYSTEMS  
The organization of a simple random-scan (vector) system is shown in Fig. 2-32.  
An application program is input and stored in the system memory along with a  
graphics package. Graphics commands in the application program are translated  
by the graphics package into a display file stored in the system memory. This dis 
play file is then accessed by the display processor to refresh the screen. The dis 
play processor cycles through each command in the display file program once  
during every refresh cycle. Sometimes the display processor in a random-scan  
system is referred to as a display processing unit or a graphics controller.  

Figure 2-32  
Architecture of a simple randomscan system.  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Graphics patterns are drawn on a random-scan system by directing the section 2-4  
electron beam along the component lines of the picture. Lines are defined by the Graphics Monilors  values for their coordinate endpoints, and these input coordinate values are con- and Worksrations  verted to x and y deflection voltages. A scene is then drawn one line at a time by  
positioning the beam to fill in the line between specified endpoints.  
2-4  
GRAPHICS MONITORS AND WORKSTATIONS  
Most graphics monitors today operate as rasterscan displays, and here we sur 
vey a few of the many graphics hardware configurations available. Graphics sys 
tems range hm small general-purpose computer systems with graphics capabil-,  
ities (Fig. 2+) to sophisticated fullcolor systems that are designed specifically  
for graphics applications (Fig. 2-34). A typical screen resolution for personal com 

Figure 2-33  
A desktop general-purpose  
computer system that can be used  
for graphics applications. (Courtesy of  
Apple Compula. lnc.)  

-- - -- --  
Figure 2-34  
Computer graphics workstations with keyhrd and mouse input devices. (a) The Iris  
Indigo. (Courtesyo\ Silicon Graphics Corpa~fion.) (b) SPARCstation 10. (Courtesy 01 Sun Microsyslems.)  
5 7  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Cham 2 puter systems, such as the Apple Quadra shown in Fig. 2-33, is 640 by 480, al 
Overview of Graphics Systems though screen resolution and other system capabilities vary depending on the  size and cost of the system. Diagonal screen dimensions for general-purpose per 
sonal computer systems can range from 12 to 21 inches, and allowable color se 
lections range from 16 to over 32,000. For workstations specifically designed for  
graphics applications, such as the systems shown in Fig. 2-34, typical screen reso 
lution is 1280 by 1024, with a screen diagonal of 16 inches or more. Graphics  
workstations can be configured with from 8 to 24 bits per pixel (full-color sys 
tems), with higher screen resolutions, faster processors, and other options avail 
able in high-end systems.  
Figure 2-35 shows a high-definition graphics monitor used in applications  
such as air traffic control, simulation, medical imaging, and CAD. This system  
has a diagonal scm size of 27 inches, resolutions ranging from 2048 by 1536 to  
2560 by 2048, with refresh rates of 80 Hz or 60 Hz noninterlaced.  
A multim system called the MediaWall, shown in Fig. 2-36, provides a  
large "wall-sized display area. This system is designed for applications that re 
quirr large area displays in brightly lighted environments, such as at trade  
shows, conventions, retail stores, museums, or passenger terminals. MediaWall  
operates by splitting images into a number of Sections and distributing the sec 
tions over an array of monitors or projectors using a graphics adapter and satel 
lite control units. An array of up to 5 by 5 monitors, each with a resolution of 640  
by 480, can be used in the MediaWall to provide an overall resolution of 3200 by  
2400 for either static scenes or animations. Scenes can be displayed behind mul 
lions, as in Fig. 2-36, or the mullions can be eliminated to display a continuous  
picture with no breaks between the various sections.  
Many graphics workstations, such as some of those shown in Fig. 2-37, are  
configured with two monitors. One monitor can be used to show all features of  
an obpct or scene, while the second monitor displays the detail in some part of  
the picture. Another use for dual-monitor systems is to view a picture on one  
monitor and display graphics options (menus) for manipulating the picture com 
ponents on the other monitor.  

Figure 2-35  
A very high-resolution (2560 by  
2048) color monitor. (Courtesy of  
BARCO Chromatics.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 

 he Mediawall: A multiscreen display system. The image displayed on  
this 3-by-3 array of monitors was created by Deneba Software. (Courtesy  

Figurr 2-37  
Single- and dual-monitor graphics workstations. (Cdurtq of Intngraph  
Corpratiun.)  
Figures 2-38 and 2-39 illustrate examples of interactive graphics worksta tions containing multiple input and other devices. A typical setup for CAD appli cations is shown in Fig. 2-38. Various keyboards, button boxes, tablets, and mice  are attached to the video monitors for use in the design process. Figure 2-39  shows features of some types of artist's workstations.  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 

- - - - - .. -  
Figure 2-38  
Multiple workstations for a CAD group. (Courtesy of Hdctf-Packard  
Complny.)  

Figure 2-39  
An artist's workstation, featuring a color raster monitor, keyboard,  
graphics tablet with hand cursor, and a light table, in addition to  
data storage and telecommunications devices. (Cburtesy of DICOMED  
C0t)mation.)  
2-5  
INPUT DEVICES  
Various devices are available for data input on graphics workstations. Most sys 
tems have a keyboard and one or more additional devices specially designed for  
interadive input. These include a mouse, trackball, spaceball, joystick, digitizers,  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
dials, and button boxes. Some other input dev~ces usea In particular applications Wion 2-5 - are data gloves, touch panels, image scanners, and voice systems. Input Devices  
Keyboards  
An alphanumeric keyboard on a graphics system is used primarily as a device  
for entering text strings. The keyboard is an efficient device for inputting such  
nongraphic data as picture labels associated with a graphics display. Keyboards  
can also be provided with features to facilitate entry of screen coordinates, menu  
selections, or graphics functions.  
Cursor-control keys and function keys are common features on general 
purpose keyboards. Function keys allow users to enter frequently used opera 
tions in a single keystroke, and cursor-control keys can be used to select dis 
played objects or coordinate positions by positioning the screen cursor. Other  
types of cursor-positioning devices, such as a trackball or joystick, are included  
on some keyboards. Additionally, a numeric keypad is,often included on the key 
board for fast entry of numaic data. Typical examples of general-purpose key 
boards are given in Figs. 2-1, 2-33, and 2-34. Fig. 2-40 shows an ergonomic  
keyboard design.  
For specialized applications, input to a graphics application may come from  
a set of buttons, dials, or switches that select data values or customized graphics  
operations. Figure 2-41 gives an example of a button box and a set of input dials.  
Buttons and switches are often used to input predefined functions, and dials are  
common devices for entering scalar values. Real numbers within some defined  
range are selected for input with dial rotations. Potenhometers are used to mea 
sure dial rotations, which are then converted to deflection voltages for cursor  
movement.  
Mouse  
A mouse is small hand-held box used to position the screen cursor. Wheels or  
rollers on the bottom of the mouse can be used to record the amount and direc 

Figure 2-40  
Ergonomically designed keyboard  
with removable palm rests. The  
slope of each half of the keyboard  
can be adjusted separately. (Courtesy  
of Apple Computer, Inc.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Chapter 2 tion of movement. Another method for detecting mouse motion is with an opti 
Overview of Graphics Svstrms cal sensor. For these systems, the mouse is moved over a special mouse pad that  has a grid of horizontal and vertical lines. The optical sensor deteds movement  
acrossthe lines in the grid.  
Since a mouse can be picked up and put down at another position without  
change in curs6r movement, it is used for making relative change.% in the position  
of the screen cursor. One, two, or three bunons m usually included on the top of  
the mouse for signaling the execution of some operation, such as recording &- 
sor position or invoking a function. Mast general-purpose graphics systems now  
include a mouse and a keyboard as the major input devices, as in Figs. 2-1,2-33,  
and 2-34.  
Additional devices can be included in the basic mouse design to increase  
the number of allowable input parameters. The Z mouse in Fig. 242 includes  

- --  
Figuw 2-41  
A button box (a) and a set of input dials (b). (Courtesy of Vcaor Cownl.)  

Figure 2-42  
The 2 mouse features three bunons,  
a mouse ball underneath, a  
thumbwheel on the side, and a  
trackball on top. (Courtesy of  
Multipoinl Technology Corporat~on.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
three buttons, a thumbwheel on the side, a trackball on the top, and a standard Mon2-5  
mouse ball underneath. This design provides six degrees of freedom to select Input Devices  
spatial positions, rotations, and other parameters. Wtth the Z mouse, we can pick  
up an object, rotate it, and move it in any direction, or we can navigate our view 
ing position and orientation through a threedimensional scene. Applications of  
the Z mouse include ~irtual reality, CAD, and animation.  
Trackball and Spaceball  
As the name implies, a trackball is a ball that can be rotated with the fingers or  
palm of the hand, as in Fig. 2-43, to produce screen-cursor movement. Poten 
tiometers, attached to the ball, measure the amount and direction of rotation.  
Trackballs are often mounted on keyboards (Fig. 2-15) or other devices such as  
the Z mouse (Fig. 2-42).  
While a trackball is a two-dimensional positioning device, a spaceball (Fig.  
2-45) provides six degrees of freedom. Unlike the trackball, a spaceball does not  
actually move. Strain gauges measure the amount of pressure applied to the  
spaceball to provide input for spatial positioning and orientation as the ball is  
pushed or pulled in various diredions. Spaceballs are used for three-dimensional  
positioning and selection operations in virtual-reality systems, modeling, anima 
tion, CAD, and other applications.  
joysticks  
A joystick consists of a small, vertical lever (called the stick) mounted on a base  
that is used to steer the screen cursor around. Most bysticks select screen posi 
tions with actual stick movement; others respond to inksure on the stick. FI~  
2-44 shows a movable joystick. Some joysticks are mounted on a keyboard; oth 
ers lnction as stand-alone units.  
The distance that the stick is moved in any direction from its center position  
corresponds to screen-cursor movement in that direction. Potentiometers  
mounted at the base of the joystick measure the amount of movement, and  
springs return the stick to the center position when it is released. One or more  
buttons can be programmed to act as input switches to signal certain actions once  
a screen position has been selected.  

- . .  
Figure 2-43  
A three-button track ball. (Courlrsyof Mtnsumne~l Sysfems lnc., Nomlk,  
Connccticul.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Chapter 2  
Overview of Graphics Systems  
Figrrr 2-44  
A moveable pystick. (Gurtesy of CaIComp Group; Snndns  
Assm+tes, Inc.)  
In another type of movable joystick, the stick is used to activate switches  
that cause the screen cursor to move at a constant rate in the direction selected.  
Eight switches, arranged in a circle, are sometimes provided, so that the stick can  
select any one of eight directions for cursor movement. Pressuresensitive joy 
sticks, also called isometric joysticks, have a nonmovable stick. Pressure on the  
stick is measured with strain gauges and converted to movement of the cursor in  
the direction specified.  
Data Glove  
Figure 2-45 shows a data glove that can be used to grasp a "virtual" object. The  
glove is constructed with a series of sensors that detect hand and finger motions.  
Electromagnetic coupling between transmitting antennas and receiving antennas  
is used to provide information about the position and orientation of the hand.  
The transmitting and receiving antennas can each be structured as a set of three  
mutually perpendicular coils, forming a three-dimensional Cartesian coordinate  
system. Input from the glove can be used to position or manipulate objects in a  
virtual scene. A two-dimensional propdion of the scene can be viewed on a  
video monitor, or a three-dimensional projection can be viewed with a headset.  
Digitizers  
A common device for drawing, painting, or interactively selecting coordinate po 
sitions on an object is a digitizer. These devices can be used to input coordinate  
values in either a two-dimensional or a three-dimensional space. Typically, a dig 
itizer is used to scan over a drawing or object and to input a set of discrete coor 
dinate positions, which can be joined with straight-Iine segments to approximate  
the curve or surface shapes.  
One type of digitizer is the graphics tablet (also referred to as a data tablet),  
which is used to input two-dimensional coordinates by activating a hand cursor  
or stylus at selected positions on a flat surface. A hand cursor contains cross hairs  
for sighting positions, while a stylus is a pencil-shaped device that is pointed at  
www.LearnEngineering.in

www.LearnEngineering.in 
Figure 2-45  
Section 2-5  
Input Dwices  
. . . - - - - - - . ..  

A virtual-reality xene, displayed  
on a two-dimensional video  
monitor, with input from a data  
glove ad a spa;eball. (Courfesy ofne  
Compufrr Graphics Cmfer, Dnrmsfadf,  
positions on the tablet. Figures 2-46 and 2-47 show examples .of desktop and  
floor-model tablets, using hsnd CUTSOTS that are available wiih 2,4, or 16 buttons.  
Examples of stylus input with a tablet am shown in Figs. 2-48 and 2-49. The  
artist's digitizing system in Fig. 249 uses electromagnetic resonance to detect the  
three-dimensional position of the stylus. This allows an artist to produce different  
brush strokes with different pressures on the tablet surface. Tablet size varies  
from 12 by 12 inches for desktop models to 44 by 60 inches or larger for floor  
models. Graphics tablets provide a highly accurate method for selecting coordi 
nate positions, with an accuracy that varies from about 0.2 mm on desktop mod 
els to about 0.05 mm or less on larger models.  
Many graphics tablets are constructed with a rectangular grid of wires em 
bedded in the tablet surface. Electromagnetic pulses are aenerated in sequence  

Figure 2-46  
The Summasketch 111 desktop tablet with a 16-button  
hand cursor. (Courtesy of Surnmgraphin Corporalion.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Ckptw 2  
Overview of Graphics Swerns  
Figure 2-47  
The Microgrid 111 tablet with a 16  
button hand cursor, designed for  
digitizing larger drawings. (Court9  
@Summngraphics Corporation.)  
along the wires, and an electric signal is induced in a wire coil in an activated sty 
4 lus or hand cursor to record a tablet position. Depending on the technology, ei ther signal strength, coded pulses, or phase shifts can be used to determine the  _ - position on the tablet.  
Acoustic (or sonic) tablets use sound waves to detect a stylus position. Ei-  
- ther strip rnicmphones or point rnicmphones can be used to detect the wund  emitted by an electrical spark from a stylus tip. The position of the stylus is calcu 
Figure 2-48  
The NotePad desktop tablet  
with stylus. (Courtq of  
CaIComp Digitizer Division,  
a prt of CaIComp, Inc.)  
Figrrrc 2-49  
An artist's digitizer system, with a  
pressure-sensitive, cordless stylus.  
(Courtesy of Wacom Technology  
Corporalion.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
lated by timing the arrival of the generated sound at the different microphone 2-5  
positions. An advantage of two-dimensional accoustic tablets is that the micro- Input Devices  
phones can be placed on any surface to form the "tablet" work area. This can be  
convenient for various applications, such as digitizing drawings in a book.  
Three-dimensional digitizers use sonic or electromagnetic transmissions to  
word positions. One electiomagnetic transmission method is similar to that  
used in the data glove: A coupling between the transmitter and receiver is used  
to compute the location of a stylus as it moves over the surface of an obpct. Fig 
ure 2-50 shows a three-dimensional digitizer designed for Apple Macintosh com 
puters. As the points are selected on a nonmetallic object, a wireframe outline of  
the surface is displayed on the computer saeen. Once the surface outline is con 
structed, it can be shaded with lighting effects to produce a realistic display of  
the object. Resolution of this system is hm 0.8 mm to 0.08 mm, depending on  
the model.  
Image Scanners  
Drawings, graphs, color and black-and-whte photos, or text can be stored for  
computer processing with an image scanner by passing an optical scanning  
mechanism over the information to be stored. The gradations of gray scale or  
color are then recorded and stored in an array. Once we have the internal repre 
sentation of a picture, we can apply transformations to rotate, scale, or crop the  
picture to a particular screen area. We can also apply various image-processing  
methods to modify the array representation of the picture. For scanned text  
~nput, various editing operations can be performed on the stored documents.  
Some scanners are able to scan either graphical representations or text, and they  
come in a variety of sizes and capabilities. A small hand-model scanner is shown  
in Fig. 2-51, while Figs 2-52 and 2-53 show larger models.  

-  
Fi,yurr 2-56  
A three-dimensional digitizing  
system for use with Apple  
Macintosh computers. (Courtesy of  
'Mm lmnphg.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
Overview of Graphics Systems  
- --  
Figure 2-51  
A hand-held scanner that can be used to input  
either text or graphics images. (Courtesy of  
Thuhre, lnc.)  

Figure 2-52  
Desktop full-color scanners: (a) Flatbed scanner with a resolution of 600 dots per inch.  
(Courtesy of Sharp Elcclmnics Carpomtion.) (b) Drum scanner with a selectable resolution from 50  
to 4000 dots per inch. (Courtrsy cjHautek, Inc.)  
Touch Panels  
As the name implies, touch panels allow displayed objects or screen positions to  
be selected with the touch of a finger. A typical application of touch panels is for  
the selection of processing options that are repmented with graphical icons.  
Some systems, such as the plasma panels shown in Fig. 2-54, are designed with  
touch screens. Other systems can be adapted for touch input by fitting a transpar 
ent device with a touchsensing mechanism over the video monitor screen. Touch  
input can be recorded using optical, electrical, or acoustical methods.  
Optical touch panels employ a line of infrared light-emitting diodes (LEDs)  
along one vertical edge and along one horizontal edge of the frame. The opposite  
vertical and horizontal edges contain light detectors. These detectors are used to  
record which beams are intenupted when the panel is touched. The two crossing  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
)ccUon 2-5  
Input Devices  
- -- p~  
Figum 2-53  
A liuge floor-model scanner used to  
scan architeaural and e@aerhg  
drawings up to 40 inches wide and  
100 feet long. (Courtesy of  
Summagraphin Corpomfion.)  
beams that are interrupted idenhfy the horizontal and vertical coordinates of the  
screen position selected. Positions tin be selected with an accuracy of about 1/4  
inch With closely spaced LEDs, it is possible to bd two horizontal or two ver 
tical beams simultaneously. In this case, an average position between the two in 
terrupted beams is recorded. The LEDs operate at infrared frequenaes, so that  
the light is not visible to a user. Figure 2-55 illustrates the arrangement of LEDs in  
an optical touch panel that is designed to match the color and contours of the  
system to which it is to be fitted.  
An electrical touch panel is constructed with two transparent plates sepa 
rated by a small distance. One of the plates is coated with a mnducting material,  
and the other plate is coated with a resistive material. When the outer plate is 
touched, it is fod into contact with the inner plate. This contact creaks a volt 
age drop aaoss the msistive plate that is converted to the coordinate values of  
the selected screen position.  
In acoustical touch panels, high-frequency sound waves are generated in  
the horizontal and vertical directions aaoss a glass plate. Touclung the saeen 
causes part of each wave to be reflected from the finger to the emitters. The saeen  
position at the point of contact is calculated from a measurement of the time in 
terval between the transmission of each wave and its reflection to the emitter.  

Figum 2-54  
Plasma panels with touch screens. (Courtesy of Phofonies Systm.)  
www.LearnEngineering.in
www.LearnEngineering.in 
'=w 2  
Ovecview of Graphics Syhms  
Fiprr 2-55  
An optical touch panel, showing  
the aRangement of infrared LED  
uni6 and detectors mund the  
edgea of the frame. (Courfesy of Ckmdl  
Td, Inc.)  
Light Pens  
Figure 2-56 shows th; design of one type of light pen. Such pencil-shaped de 
vices are used to selezt screen positions by detechng the light coming from points  
on the CRT saeen. They are sensitive to the short burst of light emitted from the  
phosphor coating at the instant the electron beam strikes a particular point. Other  
Light sources, such as the background light in the room, are usually not detected  
by a light pen. An activated light pen, pointed at a spot on the screen as the elec 
tron beam hghts up that spot, generates an electrical pulse that causes the coordi 
nate position of the electron beam to be recorded. As with cursor-positioning de 
vices, recorded Light-pen coordinates can be used to position an object or to select  
a processing option.  
Although Light pens are still with us, they are not as popular as they once  
were since they have several disadvantages compamd to other input devices that  
have been developed. For one, when a light pen is pointed at the screen, part of  
the mn image is obscumd by the hand and pen. And prolonged use of the  
hght pen can cause arm fatigue. Also, light pens require special implementations  
for some applications because they cannot detect positions within bla* areas. To  
be able b select positions in any screen area with a light pen, we must have some  
nonzero intensity assigned to each screen pixel. In addition, light pens. sometimes  
give false readings due to background lkghting in a room.  
Voice Systems  
Speech recognizers are used in some graphics workstations as input devices to  
accept voice commands The voice-system input can be used to initiate graphics  
www.LearnEngineering.in
